&gt;It's the rich of today whose actions determine how big the slice of the pie is that everyone else has to share.  this is wrong.  wealth is not a zero sum game.
273
Too late, the guy at the store said halo 4 was pretty cool for a 12 year old.  
Enjoy the beauty of human voice, skills, and feats in videos.
The thing with the invincibles is that they are ALWAYS level 50. From what I have noticed anyway. I could be wrong. So beating them before leveling up might be impossible...
Michonne
"I kind of like the idea" --CrispyHummingBird 2012©
1 used to run a retail women's dept ( I'm a man) and none of my (female) employees wanted to tell a customer that they didn't know what size their boobs were. 2 my wife was convinced she was a 34c by VS. actually 36DD. :) but much avail from Vickie's in that size.
But the Indiana Jones class gets a feat that turns every roll into an automatic 20. Pretty similar to the Han Solo class.
The internet, where the boys are boys, the girls are boys, and the kids are the FBI. all kidding aside, don't you dare go alone at first.
Sounds good cheers, I always get so nervous moving the lights around though I gotta say. 
Well...
"posthipsterprogmetal" - brilliant
I'm not an artist but I really do like this painting. I dont care if it's in the middle or has some symmetry, why cant THAT be the beauty? It may not have artistic depth because of it, but I really like what I get from the painting. A really naked = vulnerable girl sitting, crouching and covering her head and ears from a hoard of the dangers and load noises of bees, maybe she feels trapped somehow or uneasy within society. really enjoy it.
Washington D.C. please (IPAs, Reds, ESBs preferred)
Meh..its okay. 
115  thanks!
This is why so much 'responsive design' is one design for my iMac, one design for my iPhone 4 and some shared CSS.
Hell yes!
Haha, us? beating Kansas State? let's be realistic now...
It's called plague Inc for iPad and iPhone. I'm not sure whether you can get it for PC or not but their are a lot of similar games on the internet.
&gt;I will definitely put my nose into some deep snow  Tis always the season!
http://redditgifts.com/exchanges/secret-santa-2012/status/
I don't know what the deal is with DMs.  It's almost as if Arsene doesn't believe they're necessary, but that goes against the wisdom of every other top team in the world.  Even Barcelona, who are known to play possession, attacking football, won't play a game without Busquets or Song or another DM in midfield.  If performances showed they aren't needed that would be one thing, instead Arsenal has very often looked shaky defensively, and the need to play a defensive role has limited the influence of players like Arteta and Wilshere.  As for Nasri, I think he was world class for one 6-month period, and easily good enough to start for Arsenal most of the rest of the time.  Even when he wasn't at that peak, he was far better than Ramsey has been as a winger this season, and possibly better than Gervinho and Podolski.  It's hard to look at the pre-2008 period objectively because that's the Thierry Henry period.  The difference between 2008-2009 and now isn't that that season was so amazing, but it seemed like there were a lot of very good players at the club and only a bit of time to mature and a couple of careful additions might see the club perform amazingly well.  Sagna and Clichy were young and getting better every year, same with Van Persie and Fabregas.  There was some hope for Denilson.  Song had serious flaws, but he also had lots of potential.  Almunia wasn't the awful unreliable keeper he seemed to become.  Ramsey was showing potential...  The main thing was that nobody would have thought of Arsenal as a selling club at that point.  It was a place that brought in good players and made them excellent.  Looking back, 2008-2009 may be where the current problems began (or maybe go back 1 year to 2007-2008 when Henry left for Barcelona).  But the thing is, there wasn't then a sense that making the Champion's League was the best that Arsenal could hope for.  A lot of the starters were really young and had yet to reach the peak of their potential, but their potential seemed huge.  Now it seems like anybody who reaches their potential is sold off for a huge profit.
B o C was my first Vonnegut. He had me at "wide open beaver." I've read all but his last ones. Saw a movie today where Al Pacino mentioned"ice 9 (from Cat's Cradle).   I wonder whether Pacino actually read Vonnegut. He's so ham-handed these days I kinda doubt he was ever quiet enough to read anything. 
*...I'm specifically seeking younger guys to defile and teach*  in a perfect world, you'd be able to get government funding for that. good for you!
If its legalized federally wouldn't that cut the cartels out of the weed business?
Fans never even got to hear him one last time. This lockout is tearing me apart. 
Apparently, it's some sort of reference. Don't ask me from what, though.
&gt; first car  &gt; nice sports car  &gt; RX-7  &gt; $ 10,000  get a load of this guy
I've been smart. It's not like my comment karma is negative, it's actually 255/355 I think. 
Except they do take it from me again in March (the second half of the property tax), then again in April (income tax).
Houdini would be impressed.
Don't be afraid to jump in some hk/id pugs, just get on mumble or vent and be upfront, tell them it's your first time here and your new to the instance,   most people will be ok with it, especially with sl out there less of a big deal, also it wont hurt to read some strats before hand to help, only way to learn is to just get in there man.
That is irrelevant, if it was the same as mine then we both either lost or won on that ticket. 
Reminds me of the [El-P bird logo](http://covers1.img-themusic-world.info/000/9/9330.jpg) for some reason.
Because I thought Reddit deserved to see it.
Point.
Will do  EDIT: I only get half back but I guess a 30 dollar loss isnt too horrifying.
Please provide with taco flavored kittens 
Is that related to being a cougar? [](/spikenervous)
Perfect for the athiests
"Bald eagle flapping his wings", THEY'RE A CANADIAN TEAM.
No doubt, to each there own. Just my personal preference that's all. Everybody has there own tastes.  : )
It is at that point that I always realize just how slow Rubrick is. If there are no towers to tp to, your team has to properly wait.
Go here: http://redditgifts.com/exchanges/secret-santa-2012/status/  There's a little icon of a gift. If it does not have a date below it, they did not pick your info yet. The little 'Legend' link below the icon explains everything.
I think you are confusing love with eat.
Be honest though, the shrugging probably didn't help. 
Stats for **[throwawaynj](http://www.reddit.com/r/Loans/search?q=author%3A%27throwawaynj%27&amp;restrict_sr=on)** on r/Loans   ---------------------------------------   **Requester Stats**   * [0 Loan(s) Requested](/req_) * [3 Loan(s) Paid Back By This Redditor](/paid_) * [11 Loan(s) NOT Paid Back By This Redditor](/unpaid_)   **Lender Stats**   * [24 Loan(s) Granted To Others](/offer_) * [20 Loan(s) Paid Back To This Redditor](/paid_) * [4 Loan(s) NOT Paid Back To This Redditor](/unpaid_)   ---------------------------------------   [joined: 1 year 8 months ago - total karma: 1055](/meta_)   ---------------------------------------   [report link](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FLoans&amp;subject=cRedditBot%20Link%20Reported%20-%20http%3A%2F%2Fredd.it%2F142tec) or [send feedback](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=interwhos&amp;subject=cRedditBot%20Feedback!)   ---------------------------------------   [Hi! I'm the cRedditBot. I'm here to help protect the lenders that make this place great. Please keep in mind that I AM a bot, so you won't get a response if you PM me.](/meta_)   ---------------------------------------
Houston here, basically watching a slideshow. IPL website is fine.
AWESOME
1) What is your view on capital punishment? 2) I'm from a country where there is a greater emphasis on rehabilitation rather than punishment. What do you think of this approach?
People who don't ride buses just assume they stop at every stop. I made this mistake my first time on a bus.
i recommend [this](http://www.jcrew.com/mens_category/outerwear/wool/PRDOVR~87195/87195.jsp) j. crew one, which is under $200 with the current discount code. they also have tall sizes.
I believe that it is possible to go to Montréal in less than 48hrs from Chicago by the Lakeshore train to Albany and then the Adirondack. Or by transfer in Buffalo and Toronto. 
annnnnnd it's gone.
Yes, this is so fucking true. Students don't seem to understand the concept of a nice pint.
I'd appreciate the shit out of it if someone brought me a coffee.  If you're nervous- why don't you call her from the coffee place and say "Hey I thought I'd grab coffee for us, what should I grab you" and then that will give her an opportunity to voice a preference.
At MCT our squad went on a night patrol and we spent most of the night snapped in at the prone. When the patrol was over, we realized we were one Marine short, and when we got back to him he'd been laying there at the prone keeping watch for 18 hours. 
changing name on what?
Been looking foward to this for so long!  So much nostalgia is about to be thrown in my face, just gotta wait for this download to finish.
Yea, because they don't need him anymore, they're buddies now
I played this earlier this week but i didnt save it i dont think
Congrats man, here's hoping you spot your creation in some play video or something.
While I appreciate the angle you're shooting from, the sun has back-lit the text on the poster, which is very distracting. Part of his face is obscured behind the sign, making it look like he's hiding behind the sign, but I cannot tell if the sign or the man is the subject of the photo. The park sign in the background is also distracting.
I know everyone hates the Maybelline Dream Bouncy Blush, but it works great for me! I apply it with my fingers over my BB cream. And the texture is just so fun :D 
It'd be so cool if it did.
The best thing you can do is use baby shampoo without water first, and then flush it out. For military training we were OCed, and to deacon you use baby shampoo, then flush out your eyes and face while making sure that the water just drips off.  Then all you can do is let it dry out for a few hours, and start it all over again. 
Hah, exactly what I'm doing right now.
Mine does that too but after it's done reading, it kept the symbol there (right next to the pulse). Right on the box it says, and I quote "Irregular Heartbeat Detector: This monitor can detect irregular heartbeats while your blood pressure is being measured. If an irregular heartbeat is detected, an indicator icon will appear, alerting you so you can consult with your medical professional." And then it shows a little heart symbol on the left. It only appeared on one of my readings though.
You can't.
Mine does that too but after it's done reading, it kept the symbol there (right next to the pulse). Right on the box it says, and I quote "Irregular Heartbeat Detector: This monitor can detect irregular heartbeats while your blood pressure is being measured. If an irregular heartbeat is detected, an indicator icon will appear, alerting you so you can consult with your medical professional." And then it shows a little heart symbol on the left. It only appeared on one of my readings though.
You can eat, just plain rice, ramen and potatoes.
http://www.theoptionsguide.com/
Holy shit, all those dudes are fucked up!  
Why no Bro Frodo, Bro?
/r/spacedicks is your inspiration
The best way to learn is hands on learning.  So, take a fork, see if its magnetic by touching it with fridge magnets.  Then, study waves by filling up a bathtub of water and dropping in the fork and measuring the dimensions of the waves.  Finally, you can study circuitry by putting the fork in an outlet.  You'll learn everything you need to know!  A+, Bravo!
This one looks pretty damn awesome - I'll need to remember to get a toolset for when I move out in a month or two.  Congratulations on the nice gift =)
[Shucks!](http://imagemacros.files.wordpress.com/2009/06/oh_you.jpg?w=720) :)
ahhh  I'm so sorry.
If you want to get a good shot, that's the way to go. Too many people think they can get a good picture on the first try and don't take multiple exposures, and end up with crappy pictures. good job!
Being a "white knight": The worst thing ever.
Jakes eyes are wrong
Yeah, I wouldn't go out of my way to bring it up. But people who graduate from BYU have to deal with that for the rest of their lives.
What can I do to help? ;)
Upvoting for subtle scruffy costume.
What happened to the Salafists? I thought they were a pretty mellow bunch, now I hear the name in connection with a lot of killing and hate mongering. Did something change or did someone piss them off in particular, recently ?
In Huk's defence, most Protoss seem to be struggling to do anything other than Gateway/Robo two base all-ins against Zerg at the moment.
Only in America 
Heh, maybe I should add local commercial real-estate figures to the comparison too.   Plibersek is also one of the rare Labor MPs (iirc) who isn't a member of a faction, so there's a chance she's had to make up the resource gap with funding. 
Between all those? FF9 all the way. By far the best Final Fantasy ever. 
Absolutely, and if she stuck with it for a few more minutes and got the gist of how it related to real-world spatial awareness, it would have been fine. However, if a person is unprepared for or uninterested in figuring out the control scheme of a game, or immersing oneself - as you put it- it's not going to turn out well. The point being, a person unfamiliar with modern gaming or a "casual gamer" is going to get turned off immediately by even moderately complex control schemes or gameplay mechanics, so CoD, despite being ridiculously popular, really wasn't targeted towards the general consumer the way casual wii games are. 
Daryl
Lol someones actually covered gonna fly now on a kazoo and posted it on [youtube](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=sIzGdeXDbLM)
What's wrong with that? Suspension is everything when it comes to handling. It's what keeps the tires on the road. I'm not sure why you responded like this.
same thing happened to me...  sometime I do interval training when I run... during this particular run, I was approaching a red light and saw the counter going 10, 9 ... so I started sprinting to cross the intersection and ran as fast as I could but then I just continued sprinting after crossing for another 30 seconds... and when I slowed down, a firetruck crossed me and fireman where cheering for me... seems like they were behind me making sure no one come closer till while I am sprinting... :) that was an amazing sprint... I felt like usain bolt just 10 times slower.... :P
Zombie #4,812.
Main Novel Flow  Fall of Reach -&gt; Flood -&gt; First Strike -&gt; Ghosts of Onyx -&gt; Glasslands -&gt; The Thursday War  I agree, Onyx is a major behind the game location
"Augmented Reality Tabletop Warhammer". Calling it.
....Why?
Everything is funner with a group.
And you won't tell us because...?
I agree. The naval battles are so fun on this game, i think they deserve their own game.   Assassin's Creed: Far Side of the World
The one Taurus 1911 I've handled had a bad slide to frame fit. Worse than my cheaper RIA.
I hear you. I have bright orange hair. And when the sun hits it? Jesus, it's like I'm a sun god :T It attracts so much attention...  Edit: For a girl who is socially awkward...attention freaks me out. I don't know what to do with myself D;
same way my man gets me to shut up lol
booooo
Yeah, what you said. 
I think it is in your best interest to find the most comfortable compromise between your self-absorption and the welfare of your children and their mother. This is because you don't feel bad about the things you do to your kids and to your partner, so we need to find the most pragmatic way for you to get what you want while minimizing the burden you put on everyone else. I say this only because you seem to be unable to fulfill the role of dutiful father/partner, so it's a matter of minimizing the damage done to all parties.  If you think your partner would be comfortable with an open relationship and is capable of accepting it, then you should pursue it. However, you may find that she reluctantly agrees to it only because she perceives that the alternative is worse. In that case, you only prolong her misery while you reap all the benefits. If that's the case, you need to just let her go, catch and release. Give her a chance to be with someone that can make her happy.
You poor, uneducated, stubborn fool,  It is with great interest that I must inform you that both your logic and your reasoning are flawed, and that you are obviously misinformed about the topic at hand. To be honest, you represent the small part of every community which lacks the ability to think and comprehend things like humans do. In fact, your mental capabilities would closely resemble that of a lump of turd. I had second thoughts about writing this, as I am not sure if you have the skills associated with reading. I kindly ask you, on behalf of everyone else, to kill yourself, thereby removing yourself from the gene pool to prevent people like you from being born.  You have permission to writhe in your own idiocy.  Sincerely, Your intellectual superior.
Haha I thought so! Going to my local of shop and getting some paste. Can't wait to try out my new 7850 2gb. Thanks
That sounds like a bogus reason to dismiss winter running. Sounds like you run for a superficial status or something.
Poor self esteem isn't very sexy.
I've sent two tickets in and get responses within an hour
medic? heavy? are you doing tf2 talk without me? D:
The Jewish Holocaust happened mostly in Hollywood, the number of 6 million Jews killed was also pulled out of thin air after decades of exaggeration. 
Thanks for your reply. After rereading my post, I should clarify that talk of us officially dating never came up when we were hooking up. Obviously the idea was in both our heads, but this is one of those "we never really communicated about what was going on" moments that I referenced in my original post. I now realize a blunt conversation would have gone a long way. I honestly don't know why I never brought it up. I think I was guarded because I knew how tricky the situation was, and didn't want to open that part of myself up too quickly because there was so much at stake. And I'm sure this sent mixed signals.  The first time we actually talked about taking our relationship to a different level was when he told me he wasn't interested in a relationship. And it stopped after that. (Side note: he's now seeing a girl who he's very much interested in having a relationship with, and although it's irrational I'm a little hurt by him now wanting something only a few months ago he told me he had no interest in.)  I hate to think that our friendship was based on him being interested in me, but after the "break up" it's impossible to be as affectionate and carefree as we once were. I'm sure it's a mix of us having to destroy all the feelings we had and not knowing when the line is being crossed.   Thanks for offering your advice and being so blunt. This situation was a first for me, and I'm still trying to figure out what I did/what I could have done to avoid the messiness. Obviously communicating would have made a world of difference, and I'm wondering if I should talk with him now so we can set some sort of foundation to move on from instead of living in this unspoken gray area of friendship.
good job Clg.na game 1... lotsa plays.  the Fnatic vs TPA game 1 verrrrrry good
They meant as opposed to boring and ridiculous.
I'm gonna proofread your mom.
No, serveral-year-old iphone actually...
Remember MeatyDeathstar, you are always running your own race. If you go running with someone in better shape than yourself, then YOU must set the pace. They are there for your entertainment only, not to push you harder. If they try, tell them to suck it. The only way running stays fun is if you do it for yourself and nobody else. Speeding up when passing attractive members of the opposite/same sex however is expectable. 
Exreme chauvinism is present here - just look at the downvotes lol.  You want to see belligerent - try watching Barak Obama "negotiate" with Repulbicans.   So far, all I've seen is "My way or the highway". Seriously it is almost impossible to get an idea in here edgewise if you are conservative.  If you are conservative, "belligerant" is a very accurate description of how we feel our government is acting.
I'll look into condoms for oral sex. I've never heard of that. 
what server
Peter Schiff has a historically bad track record at predictions. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=z5qdkPlwvrc  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8oJCOlwZUic  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Ufa9uOOg1zA  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XfrfKa7tibI  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=bv4-o2b10_k  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=sdBcHX4ipYw  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Ufa9uOOg1zA  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=XfrfKa7tibI  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=bv4-o2b10_k  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9Cnr8dVSx44  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=sdBcHX4ipYw  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=C6I8oloCYJg  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Zvz26kyhaCo
Pardon me for asking, but what does schizophrenia have to do with her voice? I know it comes in many varieties, but I've never heard anything related to other peoples voices.
Removing the USB disk without ejecting it safely. So badass.
Maybe something open-world and fun, like GTA IV, Just Cause 2, or Saints Row The Third? This will let her do whatever she wants whenever, which may appeal to her. Plus, the shooting in those games will provide a simple introduction into shooters. Also, maybe the Assassin's Creed Series. Those are awesome, and don't require a whole lot of skill whatsoever
&gt; This also needs to be said......I am also depressed, I self harm, and I'm not diagnosed but I have some really bad bipolar tendencies  Sorry to say, but you are not ready for a relationship.  A relationship is about giving yourself to another person.  If you are not comfortable with yourself, you can't share it with another.  
I think you're thinking of reddits agenda. Fuck everyone who isn't liberal, athiest, or pro Obama, right? Right.   Edit: Not sure why I'm being downvoted when you all know it's true. Speak the truth on reddit that the people don't want to hear and they downvote you.
Definitely [Eulogy by Tool](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=s57FtD2HKLw&amp;feature=youtube_gdata_player). Word on the street is this song is about either L. Ron Hubbard or Jesus. Doesn't matter to me; I'm dead. 
I would say that's below average and not very good.
shr00mies.
This scenario never happens:  "Hey, you're an asshole!"  **SNAP**  "WAAAAH, MY ARM! YOUR WORD BROKE MY ARM!!! WHY? HOW???"  It's just sound! It's on par with a burp, or a sigh, if you're offended, just... don't... listen?
Got the first two issues and decided it's totally a "bookshelf worthy" book, so I've been reading trades now. What I've read is mindblowing. Graham's really got balls with the bold, weird story he's crafting.
I always try to be one of the 2 or 3 people who listen to the new speaker. I always feel bad that they got interrupted when trying to contribute.
It's like being an ally on chogall
CLGEEEEEEEEEE G
What the fuck?? Did you get his plates? I'm not a lawyer, but I'm pretty sure that that's in the realm of attempted homicide. 
The learning curve on Foobar is higher.  Some of the screenshots look nice, but I feel like I need to take a class to get to that point.  Even my mom can figure iTunes out without too much trouble.
owww looks amazing...
Repost!! Lol this is like 9gag because reposts are everywhere go be a fag and repost on 9gag lol
Yeee, uptoke for the bay 
DUH!
Ahahaha. "Hotshot is contributing greatly to the team. Standing still and ulting. All he needs to do." Watching Hotshot just standstill tanking  towershots Lux abilities and ezreal autoatacks and taking no damage at all. Too tanky and shields too strong.
lel
i scribble important stuff on the desk
I like how the OP's name is cock.
I hate the fal too
The space race is back on, I guess.
I disagree. This is totally a relaxed collegiate look that says I dress better than the average student but I'm just as young and cool.
That was more like a massive WTF!
Also Obama won by 3,476,775 votes. 50.6% to 47.8% or a difference of 2.8%
If you want a serious response, maybe make a less obscene title. But seriously, AdBlock if youre having that many problems, id say youve given them enough revenue for one day.
&gt; They weren't written down by people who believed them to be fact, taught as fact for almost two millenia, and then conveniently relabeled as "metaphors" when they were proven to be false or stopped jiving with modern society.  Neither was the bible. Literalism as a "mainstream" belief is a fairly recent development. Those people are crackpots.
I know I'm just a random internet goer, but good on you :] I know it takes a lot to kick something like that.
Chung cracked me up too.
Wow, 2 weeks.  It must have been on death's door by the time it was found.
To be fair, the ones that have been posted today would be funny without captions.
If I remember correctly, there've been sightings of other odd things at FMB. This isn't that far from all the weird AF stuff at Hurlburt Field, either. A lot of equipment still in the testing phase gets sent there because if they trash something, it just falls into the Gulf of Mexico, and not into a school or somebody's back yard.  If it is aliens, well damn it, they probably just want to go check out Fort Myers Beach and eat at some of the awesome restaurants there. I've been to a lot of beaches, and I freaking love that place. It's great.
No I like that they're seasonal and not an everday thing! It's so much more special that way, no? 
Can I ask the reasoning they gave for deciding to suddenly revoke the approval? 
We have a navy? :O
English Teacher?
I can't decide if this is one of the dumbest or coolest idea I've ever seen. So torn.
AND MY AXIS!
Yeah, when my thoughts turn to all the amazing things that I am missing by not drinking, I do need to remember what the reality was like - as you say - getting drunk alone and feeling sorry for myself. The good times of drunken fellowship were pretty well gone by the time I got sober. 
"The first group of rebels had a noble enough cause."  What happened to them? Are they still in this? Its insane how a democracy can become so corrupt. My understanding of this is limited and its people like you that help people like me understand what it is thats going on in the world. 
There is also data over cable (coax tv cable) too.  I think it's called MOCA and it works surprisingly well, and is pretty fast.  It doesn't mess with TV signal either.  Pretty cool stuff.
Looks about right.
And the way that guy said it isn't dickish at all.
Let's steal his fillings!
i cried evry tiem
Ehhhhh.....
Indeed. Do you by chance have a lot of gasoline? I uhh.. ran out of gas in my car.
Cute, but I would name it Mauzilla ;)
yeah!   It looks like he'll be moved out tomorrow around noonish though. Apparently he's actually seeing a psychologist/psychiatrist and getting help with his alcohol problem because of all this (and it was his choice!!) so it's working out pretty good for everyone xD
Someone posted this pic a few days ago.   So you, are a liar.
this one time I walked into the kitchen a flicked the lights on at the exact same millisecond that my toast came up. it was a good day.
I left for like an hour and the thread is holy fuck bad now, what happened.
[You said it](http://i.imgur.com/LcZJg.gif)
Rural.... fuck that word
You can loop away from Dr Strange's book/projectile special with Captain America 
Alright, I see what you are saying. My issue is not the system itself, or the reason the Social Security system is there. Here is the position I stand on: Social Security does bring in money to hold and give back as entitlements (like you said, no disagreement there), but back as late as 1994, the government started spending the surplus from Social Security in its federal budget*(please reference white house federal budget at http://www.gpo.gov/fdsys/browse/collectionGPO.action?collectionCode=BUDGET). When this started happening, the pot, or cash on hand, started going to other things. This money did not go to the military since the military budget at that time was cut in a literal sense, in half. With 101 billion dollars being the difference in incomes and expenditures for Social Security, the fed is having to pay out of pocket (other taxes) to cover down on the difference.  As for your opinion on the military budget, yes I agree there is mismanagement within the military budget, but cutting the budget as a whole (federally) will not solve that issue, that issue has to be resolved internally. I say this for many reasons, and if you would like to discuss this please state your interest, otherwise we can stay on the matter of the Social Security.
So this is how skynet starts
Not sure who would buy it since getting the screen replaced would put it at the price of a new one or more. Stores probably won't give you much if at all, you might be able to sucker someone into buying it from you though. I fix phones and tablets and haven't been able to find the replacement screen, though I haven't looked in a while... 
what the fuck is an ent?
LLama bong
It seems like we are getting two different stories depending on the source. MS keeps touting impressive numbers, which I believe to be true. But any OEM provider that has said anything about Win8 has said sales are slow.   All I can put together from that is OEMs bought plenty expecting lots of sales, but demand hasn't been what they expected. Of course, that's conjecture and opinion. Financial reports will clear things up. 
Democrats are like a pack of cats. Have you tried to organize cats?  Republicans are like a pack of dogs. They are easily organized and look to party leaders.
But if they're used in a way that prevents fluid transmission they're _100%_ effective.  You shouldn't even want to know whether they're 84/99/whatever percent effective in the abstract. That's like asking what percentage of the time a hammer and some nails make a good birdhouse. A condom is a tool, and as a tool it's fit for purpose. If you use it right.  The right question is _how good am I_ at using this tool. I mean, in my hands, a hammer and nails has about a 0% chance of producing a good birdhouse. And if you hear that condoms are 99% effective and proceed to wear one on your head as a hat that won't work out for you either.
A bank wouldn't have done that. You clearly don't know what you're talking about.
If during your actual interview you came off as clumsy and forgetful, then it's a nail in the coffin.  If your interview went well, they won't care.
Great that you had the courage to take the leap. Good for you! All the best. I'm sure you'll have a nice touch with patients because your heart is in your work. 
[](/facehoof) As much as I am looking forward to college, I'm dreading dealing with student loans.
Who says climbing is mostly strength?
Maybe because they are pretty much everywhere around the world and there are 1.8 billion of them. It seems likely then that they would be involved in conflicts.
I have no idea, but this sounds like a really awesome game lol. hopefully you find it!
Yes.
They just ~~license~~ whore the IP out to any company that wants to make a D&amp;D game, which is why there are so many awful D&amp;D console/PC games.
Good luck to you sir! I hope you get it :-)
Wait so the guy pulled the chute when he could've glided it down perfectly? What the hell? Cirrus pilots, man. Cirrus pilots.
I'll wear wool trousers probably 15-20 times before having them cleaned, so I wouldn't let that discourage you.  
Here you go. http://imgur.com/ROJUE
Herds are an interesting idea.  It also makes no sense to have 50 predators and no prey in a subzone, or all of the same sort of mob.  What the hell are 50 wolves living on?  Why are none of the predators heading for the unmolested boars over the hill?  Why do the moas and dolyak almost never inhabit the same field?   One thing Rift did better than most MMOs (although still not well enough, IMO) was the variety of mobs in an area.  Tyria would feel more alive if there were a herd of dolyak, and maybe a few scattered moas, and a pack of wolves picking off the outliers over here, and an occasional skelk stealthing through the remains of the latest kill, only to be attacked by an owl griffin who swoops in after the wolves have left... and on, and on, and on.  A bunch of lone wolves standing around in this field, while the next field has a bunch of jungle stalkers, and the next a bunch of spiders, and the next a bunch of deer, and the next a bunch of skale?  That's not alive.  I do realize it's probably much more complicated to program and balance areas for this kind of complex interaction between mobs, and that's probably why no MMO yet has really done it.  But I hope somebody figures out a way to pull it off.
More like Sherlock Holmes
Because then you'd have a huge section of the fanbase complaining that it was just "D2 with improved graphics"  They did a pretty good job considering what they have to work with.  Remember, nostalgia is a dangerous thing for gamers, because if you wait too long they get rose colored glasses and everything *seems* like it was perfect.  So when you go to make the new game, you have to compete with the *image* of the game in the heads of the gamers, plus what they want it to be.  Not an easy task, even for activision-blizzard.
I would like to see wipes every few months or even more often, maybe a competition who gets most zombie kills/bandit kills between wipes. It would make the gameplay more interesting (for me at least). It would be more about surviving, and not about hoarding sniper rifles in global inventory and shooting unarmed people, because there is nothing else to do anymore.
Literally Joffrey.
If only it rained less so we could fund a space program up here!
/wrists
bot fly larvae living high off the tit.
Well... I know what I have to try out next time I'm socerer-ing through BG2.  Holy shit.
Upvote for truth!
The people I went through school with are a mixed bunch. Those I was closest too/spent most time with have gone on to do very well and are spread out all over the world. The kids I was ok with but not really good friends have stayed in our tiny town, married each other, 2.4 kids and 2 weeks in Turkey every year.   I don't really fit in either group and I don't think I did back then either. I have not attended any reunions. I haven't seen these people for 20 years, there's a reason for that.
Chairman of the bored.
Why are there so many crazy people that such a precaution would be needed?
[so proud](http://www.reactiongifs.com/wp-content/uploads/2012/05/excited4.gif)
Awww! Cute pup, she looks so comfy and peaceful :) 
How is a cow's consciousness limited?
Mine is last in the chain.  Cleans up all the hum from other pedals.
DO DO DO DO NOT USE HIS BACKPACK.TF/UNUSUALS FOR A SOURCE!!!! I have been unusual trading for a long time, do not use most spreadsheets, it is more reliable to check for any trades with the hat for what people want v what people are offering.  Source: many spreadsheets tried to tell me my scorching crown is 4 pure max
Main Line was the part North of the city, the part down Washington Street was called "Washington Street Elevated" or "The El"
He just wanted to know if it was possible. He didn't want a paragraph explaining why it's a waste of time and an analogy for what his idea is akin to.  And then you don't even answer his question?  Why does this have 57 upvotes?
that's not what this subreddit is for.  when you break the rules*1 around here, people get upset; and when people around here get upset, you get insulted and otherwise verbally abused.  1. also holds true for disagreeing with widely held opinions. see: hivemind.  OP is a fag.
&gt;Sorry, but unless you're winding your own pickups...chances are it's not "unique".  It's fucking pathetic when you have to shit one someone for word choice. 
It's there to lull you in with the promise of sweet treats but instead dispense molten lava cheese goodness.
Thank you.
Send to Relogic!
You look stupid.
Thanks a lot for the info! 
I use the same exact thumb(nail) drive for my car stereo. Pesky little buggers to take out, even worse when you drop them...
Eh, it took them like a week to transfer me manually, lol.  Btw, you don't have same username &amp; account name on both servers, right? If so, you're gonna have to pay for a name change on one account in order to move...
It is lighter but it's also puffy making them bigger. With this increase in size there is more surface area for gravity to push down on. Using a corset can take off up to 15 lbs.
From my personal experience, I wouldn't get a Razer mouse, I've had 5 of them and they all broke after 2 months, maybe I was just unlucky, idk.  I would recommend either Logitech or SteelSeries. :)
WELL GOOD FUCKING THING HE ONLY USED ONE OF THE PHOTOS  WHAT ARE YOU GOING TO DO MOTHERFUCKER, DOWNVOTE ME?
I word holds the value that we assign it.
Oh really?
And I'm not disappointed 
I've been an /r/cringe subscriber for quite a while, and I can safely say that this is *the* most cringetastic video I have ever seen on this subreddit. I'm fucking dying inside here.  EDIT: a word
Leo knows.
Pina always does it right!
That was absolutely beautiful the artistry, the brilliance, and elegance in that flop is unmatched. 
"most people" are not the ones deciding the direction of the government though.
I agree with no posting personal information, but vendor discussion is pretty much what this sub was created for.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?feature=player_detailpage&amp;v=qZowK0NAvig#t=31s
Kat Zix combo so strong. Those resets.
No disagreement friend, just healthy debate. That's how people come to an understanding. Something that sadly is lacking a lot these days.  
Just a quick related question - is there a display setting to turn on those special resource icons like the oranges and cinnamon I see in the OP's screenshot?  I don't see those icons in my Civ V Gods &amp; Kings games, which makes it difficult to scan a large area for special resources. Particularly when I'm looking for iron or coal when they first appear, and often show up in squares that already have mines/farms/whatever.
Level 1 unusual seraphic for ss kills mod?
I couldn't see what I was shooting, so the form and symmetry are a pure fluke.  I have many other shots from the afternoon that are tack sharp, and very few of them are as interesting as this one.
Dark here. Do I get a prize for saying this is a really good server? Been on it for about a week and it's been really good so far.
Well you are on Reddit.
I'll kick it off. http://blisnemesis.bandcamp.com/
This particular one that I bought off that link from amazon did. There was no announcement either and it was a pleasant surpise. Also I was worried abut durability and craftsmanship and was also surprised at how thin and nicely it was made. The pictures kind of don't do it justice but it is pretty nice. It even has a little slot so that you can keep it secure on you hand! ONE ISSUE. the way that this thing closes is perfectly fine and sturdy but does not allow for it to sit flat on a table! That little lip lifts it up about an inch, which sometimes is nice but when you want it flat may be frustrating.
I'm having the same exact problem. Sometimes the pauses last for 5 seconds and other times I'm having to refresh. It's been acting like this since IPL started and it's only on IPL. I can watch anything else on twitch perfectly fine.
Enemy IFF/health does not appear in aircraft first-person view.  Spotting still works in either view, but IFF/health is only visible in third person.
What classes are you guys soloing with?
Grasping at straws here, but the dot at the beginning flashed three times.
[Interesting...](http://imgur.com/w16Vp)
And if you're female, it's 77 reasons to insist that if you're having sex with a man, he must wear a condom.
Mahler [Adagietto](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=VWPACef2_eY) from 5th Symphony
holding breath...
They give up a lot of catches to the RB and that is where I think Knowshon is at his best, catching balls out of the backfield.
&gt;Are you speaking of Romney and Obama?  No, I am not.  However, they can be applied to what I was talking about since I did not mention anyone specifically.  You could apply this to every POTUS election of my lifetime.  &gt;you are correct that RP is not like either.  I never stated that.  &gt;The most fundamental difference is that “the main two candidates” had political support whereas RP had no political support two primaries in a row.  Very nice!  You get eight "hates" out of ten for this unsuccessful jab, especially because you reached so extremely far on something I never said.  &gt;American voters saw a difference in the general election so your failure to distinguish a difference between them is, well, your failure.  I didn't say they were the same human being.  I was saying they were two different humans who believed the same thing.  I understand they couldn't simultaneously be elected.  Of course the voters differentiated between one man and another.  Only one can win.  Of course you know this, but in your attempt to jab your statement came out wrong. Just because the majority thinks they greatly differ doesn't make it true.  And just because someone that is so unqualified to give input as your says so makes no difference as well.   &gt;...is, well, your failure.  People talk like this.  They don't type that.  It's like typing the word 'Ummm'.  It's douchey.
You're an idiot. I have explained my situation, offered reparations and apologies and you let the bounty ride. A 30i bounty. Do you really think you will have a single reputable hunter chase me after I have explained the situation and offered reparations for 30i? I wouldn't follow around a guy in full prot. , who has done nothing wrong for 30i. There is actual snitch evidence of you committing activities suitable for a griefer however, so I would not cast stones. Should you happen to find someone with no moral code and being flat broke to hunt me, I wish them good luck.
I'am sure it was quite quite. 
I meant reasonable person in the legal sense. It's a legal term. 
I didn't see her regain consciousness in the link provided.  She looked dead and I wish I hadn't seen it.  Was this a different video?
Your girlfriend is right :p  When your heart is with someone else, your thoughtfulness will be lacking. It's always apparent when the warmth goes out the door due to one having feelings for another, and putting energy into another.   Driving for ten hours is a pain in the ass for you, yes, but it takes nearly zero effort or thought. ;)   Be fair. Don't give Molly a half try. Give her a full, 100% effort. Don't fuck it up by trying to start something when you shouldn't.
online is really the best outside of a Kinokuniya. you should check out the japanese Pattern Magic books! they're amazing and pretty easy to follow along even without the translated texts (they have english versions, but I only got to borrow the japanese one.)
today in my astronomy class i learned that even though it is still expanding, the expansion speed is slowing down.
"The Orgy" from the Conan the Barbarian Soundtrack. Because it's just an epic song. 
And the Spurs only lost by five...with their bench. Go fuck yourself David Stern.
Nah, sell montero, get his cap space plus allocation money.
**Recycle.**
ITS HERE
http://www.ign.com/ipl/league-of-legends/ Here you go.
Am I the only one who was slightly confused as to whether this was a recent screenshot because of the Windows classic theme?
When will common sense get bombed into this?
Would love to see that!
Hahaha you gave the surgeon some head 
but there were good reasons why that idea wouldn't work.  No force feedback for one.
You should do some research into his life, and those cases. You'll find a lot of questionable action by some people, and you'll find he wasn't proven guilty. Thanks to the media, and some other sources, it seems you've been duped. At least I can remember him as one of the greatest entertainers of all time.
I have the sensationail and love it so much. It has saved me a lot of money and is actually really fun. I use the polishes from the Sephora gel line and Red Carpet gel line too. They work just as well with the Sensationail stuff. 
hardboiled egg. Its awesome
yes, there was this guy who had bought a new phone (I'm not sure but I guess it was a windows phone) And when he was looking through the camera things he saw that his brand new phone already had a camera recording on it. appearantly this mexican looking guy works where they make the windows phones and he tested the camera feature and forgot to delete the file. 
Do you tell your buddies, its ok Alpacca him up?
i agree with him and he is lucky
damn, you have beautiful fucking hands
There are no conspiracy theories. Doctors take decisions based on the best evidence available (or at least they should), and that evidence is condensed into guidelines. Now, there are several different societies and entities publishing slightly different guidelines based on what they believe to be the best research. As an MD, I can tell you that personal health care recommendations should not be given to the patient through simple guidelines and nothing else, but through individualized care. Ask your doctor why the age discrepancy between other medical professionals, and he will give you a thorough response on the subject. If not, abandon his care and look for a professional both knowledgeable and willing to include you as a participant in your health decisions. 
/r/forwardsfromgrandma
CHAFF! That's actually the word I was looking for, to follow 'sparks'. I was tempted to give up and say 'sparks n' shit', but then there would be the inevitable shit jokes. 
What kind of computer do you use? If you say apple I might just die from laughing. 
Is that oddish modeled after oglaf's [cumsprite?](http://oglaf.com/cumsprite/2/) Barely NSFW.
Dear God of Music (that's you!).  Are you planning to release a BSG Drum Book (similar to your piano book) with sheets for drummers who wish to have your masterpieces in written form?
Wow, that's scary. I remember my first time she was so tight I thought the skin was gonna get pushed all the way down it hurt but luckily nothing tore.
You poor, uneducated, stubborn fool,  It is with great interest that I must inform you that both your logic and your reasoning are flawed, and that you are obviously misinformed about the topic at hand. To be honest, you represent the small part of every community which lacks the ability to think and comprehend things like humans do. In fact, your mental capabilities would closely resemble that of a lump of turd. I had second thoughts about writing this, as I am not sure if you have the skills associated with reading. I kindly ask you, on behalf of everyone else, to kill yourself, thereby removing yourself from the gene pool to prevent people like you from being born.  You have permission to writhe in your own idiocy.  Sincerely, Your intellectual superior.
Well, as you can imagine, they had to include more action based antagonists because it's a game. The overall plot arc is there, as are many of the details, but the scenarios along the way change.
yes
Hell yeah.  And something along the lines of being able to save up points and spending them on elite and legendary mobs that would be stronger and catch the PCs by surprise.  Maybe something to where the DM could only spawn so many mobs on a given spawn turn or spend extra points to spawn a monster nest with a larger number of monsters would be cool too.  The WiiU screen controler would be perfect for traps as well, so the DM could place them in secret.
I know a few scousers who are of the same opinion, maybe it's a northern attitude. In the south, toffs can't get enough of it. Easy money.
I lol'd
wow really... What premise gives stern the right to fine the spurs? total bs.
thanks. I've tried most of the standard treatments [all 5 of the mood stabilizers and many classes of antidepressants--even some non traditional options] and now I'm moving on to more radical therapies. I should know whether this will work or not by mid January at latest. I was hopeful about Lamictal. For some people it works so well that they can use it as a monotherapy. Did nothing for me so now we are discontinuing it. 
Having done what I wanted to do (raising sheep on acreage and playing with dogs at a doggie daycare/helping train them at night) and doing what I DON'T want to do now (cubicle rat/analyst), if I could go back to what I was doing, I would 1000 times over.  I loved raising livestock, especially for fiber and milk/cheese purposes. And part of being in the doggie daycare/training business is you end up doing a lot of rescues as well. Each one taught me so much more about animal behavior and behavioral rehabilitation than any text book ever could. I would love to bottle all that up and then write stories about my adventures...  I used to have pretty nifty adventures. Now I just browse reddit all day -sigh-
Tjohei :)
Did you accompany them with a cream based sauce?
Not explicitly, that's just me expressing the feeling that Darryl seemed hesitant to bond emotionally with the other characters up until season 3, to express this I referenced how he was a guest star for his first couple of episodes, despite how many he's been in as a main character since then.
No, it just makes you an adult.
Yet in this entire thread this guy is the only one getting called out on making a blanket statement like that. Yet countless others are making it about CPC supporters while getting upvoted to hell and no one is saying a thing.  You guys really don't get that this guy only makes posts that mirror statements people on r/Canada make about the CPC, and get upvoted for.
Great thanks...would you be using bluetooth on a PC or handheld device?
Thanks :)
i would guess this is probably not legal, or at least not appropriate in administrative terms.  is there a formal appeal process that you can enlist for help?
Funny pranks with a girl dressed like the girl from The Ring.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?feature=player_detailpage&amp;v=aU-aGd0XHtk#t=47s
The same. When I'm driving, I also wave vigorously to people who don't thank me for letting them out.
I don't really have a question I was just wanted to say and hopefully get a response because you guys are awesome!
Yes, I had Masala Dosa a couple times, I loved it! In one family the mom also taught me how to prepare dosa, we had them at least once every day. Unfortunately I didn't make it to Mysore and it's surroundings.  About Bangalore I liked the difference to what I had seen before. I liked the countryside a lot because I felt the cities were so noisy and busy, so I stayed in smaller places if I could. Banglore was so different and western-like, pulsating, modern. I stayed with two guys my age, they were awesome! It was a bit similar to the US, we went to malls, big parties, it was possible to talk to girls. I was surprised that people were just as friendly and interested in me and my country as they were in all other parts of India I've seen. Another great experience and of course a part of India too.
FUCKIN *BUUUUUUUUURN!*
You are who you pretend to be.   Did you like the movie with Nick Nolte?
Could I see a reference or some numbers on that? I've never heard of this aspect of the issue before.
sky dive, don't pull the shoot. That's how you go out like a boss. Plus, you leave one hell of a mess for someone else to clean up. A final fuck you to the world.
[this comment has violated the sensibilities of r/ShitRedditSays](http://www.reddit.com/r/ShitRedditSays+SRSSucks+antisrs/comments/142odp/mini_effort_a_quick_romabashing_session_in/)
Since you played before the 20th, Microsoft will be sending you a code unlocking the other 8 specializations for you to play and unlock. Itll happen on the 1st of December.
That's interesting, I see so many posts about guys who don't want to cum inside their girlfriends due to being scared about pregnancy..even if she is on the pill. What about it turns you on?
First list I've seen with things I really want. I'm interested in your Fire Emblem titles, Flashback and Metal Slug Anthology. That should be enough to work with. What do you think is fair?
I said citation, not the Daily Nazi.
It should be phrased  "Norwegians get to keep most of what they earn in November, so they can spend their own earnings on Christmas gifts for their family."
343i did a brilliant job with the game, but all the post-launch handling has been utter crap.
Meh
[Link to the waypoint forum post](https://forums.halowaypoint.com/yaf_postst154602_Halo-4-Specializations-Email-Facts.aspx)
But your Mom was there and is raising you. So maybe should keep pushing forward regardless of what a douche your Dad is. Don't leave her out of the lime light because your Dad's an ass. 
I am Gumner.
if only Zorkamork read usernames.  Good show chap.
looks like we're talking about two different movies. i was talking about [this.](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0099850/) TIL! have an upvote. 
3 pennants missing, from teams that are no longer around.  (Cant remember from the top of my head)
not just Texas and not just Mexicans.  Ask the Sioux how they feel about Mankato Minnesota.
On a scale from 1 to 10, I'd say I'm about a 9.5.... I'll tell you more if you dare.
my favorite fact is apprantly et was a highly evolved form of plant life, that's why they were collecting plants at the beginning.  i always assumed he was an adult, but are from a peacefull planet with little conflict, thereby making him naive
**Marlins and Pirates**  The Miami Marlins have traded Donnie Murphy to the Pirates for Clint Barmes.
I get so much pleasure watching him get so much pleasure from what he does.  One rarely sees that kind of sincere passion anymore.  Simply stated, his music makes me smile.
This is a great idea but someof these things are really weird.  'Tell someone you have to fart' ? 'Carry a banana and make it seem like your horny, than you take it out and apologize' ?????????   Sounds like stuff Chris(Simpsons Artist) would do.
Hello! Dawn dishwashing soap.
will it effectively hide the smell of weed? 
Firstly, you're very naturally pretty! You have great skin.  Secondly, I think that you (like me, Jessica Alba, Kate Moss, and Brandy) have somewhat wide-set eyes. There is more than one eye's distance between the two. I just found out, today, [through my own first B&amp;A](http://www.reddit.com/r/MakeupAddiction/comments/1421li/im_determined_to_learn_first_ba_ccw/) that when you have wide-set eyes there are a few techniques you can use to help pull them together.  * Use a taupe color to pull your eyebrows in a little bit and shade down the side of your nose * Use thicker liner and mascara towards the inner part of your eyes * Using lighter colors and white liner on the inner corner of the lid makes your eyes look wider apart. I tried reversing the colors (dark on the inside, light on the outside) and it literally blew my mind how much better it looked. I recommend you play with that concept to see if you like it!   
Forgot which one. It was like 3-5 chapters ago I think.
Go to an art supply store and choose a nice sketch book, not the cheapest or most expensive. Pick something that you will feel comfortable carrying around. For me my sketch books are all about paper feel. Not all paper is created equal, feel a page, I like the strathmore recycled 60lb or so for graphite and something textured for softer materials. Look for s spiral in the binding so you don't run the risk of your work falling out. Choose a set of pencils that go from 4h to 6b or so you will want a bit of range in the hardness. The h being the harder pencils(they will produce light shades) and the b being soft (bold shades). If you feel like going a bit further, pick up some charcoal, willow charcoal and some compressed charcoal in different harnesses. There is something very organic about charcoal and for gesture drawings its wonderful.   It doesn't matter what you draw, when or where. Just choose and object and work on basic shape, identify where the light is coming from(best to set up a situation with a single light source to start) More important than anything is ENJOY what you are doing in the moment. If something turns out like shit, learn from it! Always ask questions if you need to. Good luck and enjoy!   Also, if you choose to go tablet route I recommend the Wacom Intous. I have the Intous 4, I love itdearly.  
You didn't even hear the joke go by did you?
For whatever reason, my sister can not pronounce "horror" correctly. It always comes out sounding like she's saying "whore", or when she's really trying hard, "ho-wer".
Grul deck is underwhelming. Still top two decks gotta be Golgari and Goblins
Don't worry Matthew I got your back. -Matthew
At first when I saw this I thought "I must be higher than I thought." then the words jumped out of my phone and attacked me
Duck sauce has no ducks, either.
But he REALLY rocks..........http://www.lolriot.com/wp-content/uploads/2012/08/Napoleon-Dynamite-GIF-Dancing.gif
No dirtier than a turd or sweaty ass crack would normally get.  At least that's what I assume...
I wish in middle school I realized that the girls bullying me were just jealous. They made up rumors about me stuffing my bra and tying a band around my waist to make myself look skinnier. Of course I didn't do those things, they were just mad I had hit puberty sooner than they had which resulted in some curves. Now it's just flattering and silly to me but at the time it really upset me. 
 "Cat Scratch Fever"
You mean Likud-Beiteinu, as the party is united with Isreal Beiteinu that was led by a former bouncer and criminal. It's amazing how much bad reputation a party can get when led by a disconnected imbecile. I just hope everyone will get their shit together and vote against them.
I only believe in Feb 29 about every four years or so. 
I have three roommates. We're all nursing students in our junior year of college. Two are really girly and love to get dressed up every day for class and have designer bags - one of these is an avid baker, the other is a princess. And the last one is more arts&amp;craftsy with lots of pinterest-ing under her belt.  One has bought us all nice undies (someone can't keep secrets) the other two just went shopping today and brought back VS bags and other stuff - so more underwear. I'm the last to go shopping, and with an incredibly limited budget...  We're opening all our gifts two weekends from now before we go home for the break. Help!
No Way! All of it is gone, no decorations (wreaths or Christmas trees) Major disappointment for me. I'm obviously impressed with the snow and leaves, but disappointed for the Christmas reasons.
Would you feel like making that argument in a court of law with your own freedom on the line?  If not, you should not expect others to do it either.
His characters in Gangs of America and There Will Be Blood, I can see Luthor
Look, man, I'm going to be honest. I was just going off your mis-use of "your." 
Unfortunately, no.  Sorry!
&gt;because it was done in public, it wasn't just about learning to get along, it was about public humiliation. The humiliation being because two boys are holding hands. That is not okay whatsoever. I also just think high schools aren't the place for public humiliation of any sort.  exactly, also this was posted already http://www.reddit.com/r/lgbt/comments/142c6l/principal_makes_two_boys_publicly_hold_hands_as/
&gt; given enough time   Yeah, but this "enough time" can be kept unfeasible enough in the foreseeable future with the right entropy assumption.
I'd look on amazon or at craft stores for another button. This same thing happened to my UBs except the connector on the button part, the two hooks, fuckin broke. I was thinking of finding some skull, or maybe a coin and getting my buddy to powder coat it. It's a very easy fix.
Gonna claim this bet? Gruden is out. 
They will indeed be hearing Hollingsworth v. Perry, and for a preview be sure to read Lawrence v. Texas, especially the dissent of Scalia, A.J. ---  Scalia, A.J. has been waiting for this moment for some years now...and now it's literally a conference or two away from the court.
Noted! Thank you for your cc.
thanks a whole bunch for this, the site is GREAT
yup, good luck.
I don't even play Dungeons and Dragons, but think this is an awesome idea! 
EDIT: Sorry to bother you again, but what is the best shirt to wear under a grey sweater? [Shirt 1, H&amp;M](https://www.dropbox.com/s/3gg8qxzwaru0u9v/2012-12-01%2014.01.41.jpg) (yes, I know, shitty quality. The shirt is the same as the one I wear in the photo asking about the fit of the pants) or [Shirt 2, S. Oliver](https://www.dropbox.com/s/6uxkro4efmxuawi/2012-11-30%2020.02.40.jpg)? Should I ditch shirts with patterns and prefer more plain ones?  ---  I never wore skinny pants.  Today i tried [these](https://www.dropbox.com/s/n4ofq63uuwrkvex/2012-11-30%2019.27.31.jpg) in a store.  Should I buy them or are they too skinny for me?
"That's a really nice website you've got there, Syrian Ministry of Labor's Department of Environmental Impact Assessment. Be a shame if something were to happen to it."  "Wait, we have a website?"
Yes. yes, I see what you see :D
Thats pretty cool
I can't see it :(
Don't get me wrong. I think that international students are awesome. America is a geographically isolated country and we get a great benefit from the sociological addition of peoples from various nations, but more importantly, the international students tend to be some of the best and brightest students I have interacted with.  What I said was more of a knee-jerk political response to seeing any statement where I see Republicans supporting any form of education, which tends to, in my observations and experience, be rare.
Well, it wasn't me but I've been planning on building one. All you need is a simple set up like the Easy Star and EL-wire or ribbon, as someone else mentioned. A standard Rx will provide enough voltage, as they only need a few (3-5V).  [EasyStar](https://www.google.com/search?client=ubuntu&amp;channel=fs&amp;q=easy+star&amp;ie=utf-8&amp;oe=utf-8#q=easy+star&amp;hl=en&amp;safe=off&amp;client=ubuntu&amp;hs=z8G&amp;tbo=u&amp;channel=fs&amp;source=univ&amp;tbm=shop&amp;sa=X&amp;ei=Uki5ULC4EszpiQLPk4GQCg&amp;ved=0CD4Qsxg&amp;bav=on.2,or.r_gc.r_pw.r_cp.r_qf.&amp;fp=16ba3a419e443fa2&amp;bpcl=39314241&amp;biw=1680&amp;bih=960)  [EL Stuff](http://www.adafruit.com/category/50)  Hopefully someone will post about it once I get mine up.
Ok, so I now have 1 Adam Fenix, and 1 mechanic Baird code left. To make it fair, I will do a randomized pick. So if you would like the Adam code, comment on this! if you don't comment, you won't be entered. I will check/pick later tonight to give you guys some time to get entered. :3
This is harsh but true. Could've written it more politely, but this is exactly the thing people need to know. It doesn't automatically get better. You make it better. Happiness doesn't find you, you find it. Still, seen a few of your posts and they're pretty good. 
That's bizarre.
I like brisk and I you seem nice too!
I live in Northville too! 
mistake made a small mistake.
Have you heard of bugchasing? How much of an issue is it?
Thanks for making up for all those times that I click WTF links and just get disappointed. 
Age | User | Title | Reddit | Cmnt | Points :--|:--|:--|:--|:--|:-- 2 weeks | [mazemir](/user/mazemir) | [Ainsley](http://www.reddit.com/r/WTF/comments/12ykl2/ainsley/) | here | 73 | 745 1 month | [lorddrune](/user/lorddrune) | [I have no words](http://www.reddit.com/r/WTF/comments/10r5pr/i_have_no_words/) | here | 130 | 950 2 months | [MillaMia](/user/MillaMia) | [I guess that's why they're called Meat Curtains [NSFW]](http://www.reddit.com/r/WTF/comments/10l5jd/i_guess_thats_why_theyre_called_meat_curtains_nsfw/) | here | 266 | 910 * See **21 more** matches at [KarmaDecay](http://karmadecay.com/r/WTF/comments/141zjw/i_have_no_words/)  *This is an automated response*   [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/help/faqs/SimilarImageBot) | [Send Feedback](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=SimilarImage&amp;subject=Feedback Id 141zjw&amp;message=[Link to post](http://reddit.com/comments/141zjw/\) 'I like feedback') | [Report Error](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=SimilarImage&amp;subject=Error Id 141zjw&amp;message=Have you read the FAQ? Please specify the error.[Link to post](http://reddit.com/comments/141zjw/\) 'Help me grow')
Free R&amp;D under the guise of "market experience"!  Well, I guess there's some sort of stipulation to becoming a sponsor, but still, zero practicality in my experiences.
I keep thinking Krauthammer means "Kraut hammer", as in "kills lots of Germans."
Because he wants to impregnate you.  Creepy.
so you have a bald spot now?
I'd ask my doctor about getting on meds. The current research is showing that it is best to get on meds as soon as you find out you are POZ. SOmetimes finding a doctor who keeps abreast of the research is difficult. Do not be afraid to find second opinions. 
I'd like to participate as well.
if you watch twilight backwards it still sucks
What is the point of this...? This just makes you look like an ass. You're as bad as the "pop lovers" for shoving your music in their face.
Yeah its kinda sad that the Federal government is currently supplying 4 people in the united states monthly with marijuana. Grown at the University of Mississippi and delivered by the DEA. Yet marijuana is schedule one? It has no medicinal value AT ALL and the government is supplying it for medical use? Its like they are just waiting for these 4 people to die so they wont be contradicting their own policies. Did I mention 1 of them is a millionaire stock broker and has been supplied by the government since 1982.
Shots fired! 
I'm still convinced that the serial killer Sqweegel from CSI lives in my walls :( If I'm home alone, I basically have to sprint up the stairs and into my room, and then jump in bed and cover my whole body in bed sheets.  Because otherwise he'll get me, you know.
pleeaaase post these results. I'd love to see it also maybe the people over at r/cannabisextracts
Would you suck Christopher Walken's dick?
Rainn Wilson was consistently excellent throughout the entire episode. 
The Kanthaka is 36...
/cries in shame  No seriously, what went over my head? :P
Don't forget about the deductible.  Three years in a row I had surgeries, my deductible was $4,000 the first year, $5,000 the second, and $7,500 the third.  After each deductible was met I was covered 80/20 until I reached a cap of ~$3,000.  That's on top of the $450 a month premium. Granted, without insurance my surgeries and hospital stays would probably totaled well over $150,000
This game isn't out yet, right? People playing a leak or something?
------&gt; r/audiojerk  Edit: Bose is a great company. Just because you advertise and make a lot of money doesn't make their products shitty. Are their products the best deal in their segment? No. Do they make solid products? Yes.   Disclose: I own no Bose products but have encountered most of them and been impressed by the IE2s and the Quitecomfort 15s.   Should have expected this from this. Conformation bias and arrogance drives most audiophiles.  Lastly, CX300s are very high recommended by audiophiles and are terrible. Far inferior to earpods (that bad).   
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=SGQf6aKBhD8  This one is also a very well fanmade video too, he also has other walking dead videos and more breaking bad videos
Gorgeous!
Haha, Nicholas Hoult is the kid from About a boy http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0276751/
Hey maybe I will get to land on one of those Reapers to plant some C4...
My Freshman year I was playing football and broke my ankle with about 10 plays left. I continued playing and ended up making a sweet game winning catch with only about 4 seconds left. 
*He just clarified, blind from birth.
Yeah, their rotation seems to be different day by day. Sanders' value has dropped.   I personally dropped Ersan, then he scored 18 so I picked him back up, and he's been stinking again since that game. Idk
Don't really follow him, can you explain the reference? :)
I'm very close to purchasing the Breville Smart Grinder, what were your qualms with it?
You shall be my own Jamie Lannister. 
Would you fuck me John? I'd fuck me so hard.
Watch out! white man dancing... grab your dinner plate! 
to me it would also seem difficult to maintainence or modify considering the unusual shapes
Invite him to go drinking with a few other students from the class and try to initiate conversation.
IPL5 disagrees
It's not the length of the round, it's the caliber.
let's not forget that six trillion Jews were wiped out in the holocaust  http://i.imgur.com/wnTwB.gif
 Sign me up! [](/shysalute "I'll show those aliens who's boss.") [](/fluttershy "By which I mean I'll just cower in the corner wondering why the hell I signed up to fight aliens.")
In America, the best I've heard is a month. That's usually only if you have been with a company for several years or if you're in the military. Starting employees usually get two weeks of vacation.   I envy you Germans. 
It has to do with the fact that he would probably do it more creatively and more structured than us. Also, how would we decide whose idea for the new rule is the one that becomes official? And then what about all the people who use the language that aren't on reddit? There's too many problems with us changing it. I'd be fine with it if he made a creative and structured way to do this new rule, but he probably won't.
That doesn't make any sense, you can't sign away rights to something that doesn't exist yet.  you're missing the point, her body her decision.  It doesn't happen in your body therefore not your decision.  simple really.
Jim Schwartz has possibly the most punchable face I've ever seen.
Plot twist you were the cow who banged the sister
This is exactly the same as mine did. Should've been charging, but for some reason wasn't, then wouldn't turn back on until I replaced the battery.   If you're in the Bay area you're welcome to use my spare battery to test :)
BBQ'd pulled pork
she shouldn't have been near that forklift, obviously wasn't wearing the proper shoes. Not that shoes would have made it that much better, but it may have prevented the severity.   We had a guy working for us that something similar happened to, after he left. I am in the granite business, moving 800+lb slabs on a daily basis. The forklift (not at our shop) ran over is heel and up the back of his achilles. It broke his foot off his leg bone, then tore the muscles, ligaments etc. The only thing holding his foot to his leg was the skin on the front of his shin, and whatever muscles/tendons were left in the front. DR said he would never regain mobility, but now, 5 years later he's about 80 percent. Lots of skin grafts etc, but he's a lucky SOB  edit: he went into shock immediately, and his first thought was to take pictures. The first person he sent the pics too was his wife, who completely lost her mind. He showed me months later after he came by on crutches. Havent seen him in a while, but if I come across him I'll ask for the pics. 
As a thief, I can say that AoE is virtually useless against me (unless it's 40 players painting any entire area). Since you are essentially choosing a spot at random, I can just move away from it and wait til your AoE is over in stealth, then kill you.
yeah, to me it seemed like they were going for a more traditional power metal sound
Yea, well, a lot of 20 year-olds make poor decisions, so there isnt safety in numbers....  I get it. I am a car guy. They look sweet. Porsche. Leather. Fast. (Relatively) Cheap. But beware. You would be much better off buying a "fun" Japanese or domestic car.  Now I sound like an old fart. I'll shutup.
I was hanging on a 3 meter pole with one hand in the air, drunkenly screaming in the middle of 300 wasted people that were cheering me, while the melody "It's my life" by Bon Jovi was coming from the speakers at a bar on the beach, in the middle of the summer on a full moon night. I was pretty young.  Kinda like [this](http://imgur.com/8lTw4) 
Would you,rather have fl or ableton? Or do you know where I can crack both :p
Probably a "how-to" demonstration commonly assigned in communications classes.
Don't think he has enough for that even so. The nuke would leave nothing but ashes of him. His I don't need defense style only works against opponents who don't really use powers in straight combat. It does work well against straight out combat like Nnoitra or someone who uses his powers while fighting with only his sword like Tosen or someone like Shinji. Against all other people with powers it work against him.   Byakuya would cut him to shreds, Kyoraku's colour game would get his heart in one time, Hitsugaya would freeze him in a block, Mayuri would poison him, etc.
But really, wolves game Saturday night anyone?
*This conspiracy's context:* **[Found on George Takei's facebook. ](http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/141ktg/found_on_george_takeis_facebook/)**  ^Did ^the ^bot ^make ^a ^mistake? [^Message ^me](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=KarmaConspiracy_Bot&amp;subject=Error:\%20142t3y&amp;message=Post\%20in\%20question:\%20http://www.reddit.com/r/KarmaConspiracy/comments/142t3y/redditor_leaks_star_wars_vii_picture_all_for_some/\%0A\%0ACorrect\%20link:\%20) ^with ^the ^correct ^link ^- [^FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/KarmaConspiracy/comments/uu43r/rkarmaconspiracy_bot/)
Dang, she looks like a lot of fun. Definitely looks like a cutie I would have tried to hook up with in college.
I'll remember this next time I need to go to a supermarket for one or two things.
Taurus Demon gives me a heart attack every time I start a new game, and I consider myself a veteran of the two games (Demon's and Dark Souls). I know how to kill him, but sometimes I get caught on his leg when I try to run through them, or I fuck up trying to dodge his lunging attack, and I ALWAYS cringe really hard. Scares me.
What food court? I kept looking for a few hours before I gave up... :-/
Welcome!   What do you define as a world traveller? I spent about 6 months in Africa doing volunteer work, as well as some work in Israel and Palestine. In total I've been to about 10 countries outside the US.  Uh.. list: Spain, France, Germany, Morocco, Thailand, The Netherlands, Hong Kong (very short time), Israel, Palestine, Tanzania
http://www.youtube.com/watch?feature=player_detailpage&amp;v=qZowK0NAvig#t=31s
I think the Mormons actually enjoy the play. 
Man wait till people do really awsome pictures in MSpaint, they'll be swimmin in SC.
Less action, less multi-verse, and more darkness please. 
wha...how?? source. please source. please.
You're not going to trigger a PIR sensor with a LED. Infrared is actually a quite wide radiation band, LEDs are at one end and heat at another.  I suggest you open the sensor, short-circuit it with a crocodile clip or similar (discreetly), and don't forget to remove it the day you move out.
Arizonan here.   It snowed once. In the mountains. Away from the highway. You could see it though. Beautiful thing, ice and snow. Beautiful thing.
MY TEAM IS EVEN AWESOME AT DRUNK DRIVING.  .3 FOR THE WIIIIIN!!!  IN ALL SERIOUSNESS THOUGH I DO NOT CONDONE DRUNK DRIVING BUT IT'S THE ONLY THING THE WINGS HAVE GIVEN ME TO BE PROUD OF THIS YEAR!
Agreed.   - You could build a rig that plays games faster for like $250 less (main problem with this one is slow GPU)   - /r/buildapc is for helping you do exactly this. Dead easy, fun, and super-satisfying.
If you had read the article (or actually looked at the picture) you'd know its not a theater but a swimming pool.
Hype doesn't matter. Thirsk is a fantastic and unique map
Ya I came here also to say that aint no galerina but i'm still glad your being careful! :]
The Little Cheese is at day 70, under a 150 Watt HPS + some CFLs. There are a few scattered amber trichomes, though with the crazy white balancing they are hard to notice in the photographs. I think I will be chopping it today, or maybe I should wait a few days longer? My goal is more for sleep aid, anxiety reduction, body stone, so I like me some amber trichomes. However, CBD is mostly dependent on the genetics, so I was wondering if there is any gain for CBDs by letting it build up some more ambers first.
Warcraft 1?
It would go perfectly in a ninja's office.
boniggy#1976
You're aware that as we speak, pharmaceutical companies are selling their drugs at record prices because the government pays for them, and they are selling them in grossly oversized packages (i.e. average shot is 5m and they are selling 100ml bottles only) in order to further defraud the government, and meanwhile they have no incentive to innovate, expand, hire, etc because they are already making record profits.  
LMAO "looser".....please stop....you're gonna start dropping my IQ to your level...
Great job! I usually don't deviate from the stock camera app when using the iphone camera since the other apps haven't really had much to offer other than a clunkier user interface, but I think I'll be using this one quite a lot in the future.
I've been asked to perform some Christmas tunes.  Since I do not care to perform these by memory and while I still can't sight read music fluently yet, free notation/tab xmas music will do!
Its the best bomb simulator...
absolutely. bleh.
[](/rar21) looks awesome!
We are actually really broken and fucked up but we all dropped it. Even talked to my dad at the funeral. He disowned me 2 years ago.   It was really cool to have everyone just being the way we are. 
Well thats not really fair to gin, if momo wasnt there, he would not have set up that little stunt. We didnt see either of them go bankai, so we dont know who would have won. He was scared of his hollofication in hueco mundo right after his incident. Afterwards he uses it like 4 different times, cause he realize he need the power, and to stop being scared. This was also well into the fight, and right after, gin told him to run or die.
I do better with the DMR. But if im out of ammo, a BR will do just fine.
You can make much more as a school Custodian in my area.
FYI no mechanic charges more than $25 to patch up a single flat tire (unless there are multiple nails, and by multiple, i mean like 5 or more). So if a potential scammer tell you its more than that, then they're lying. If you find a mechanic that charges more than $25 please tell them to "go fuck themselves" for me.
Makes a lot of sense, especially considering you didn't even need to ask Esbern about what happened on the 30th of Frostfall to make him trust you.
[](/rarityprimp) But, what of your beautiful blonde mane and tail?  I think I'm going to faint!
Only repetition is trve.
No surgery, and I live in Chicago.
the 360 isn't very popular in Japan.
"We are not just mac friendly, we are mac *only*"   Well that's a pretentious way to great visitors :(
You want to kick someone on the ground and you consent to being hit yourself, man or woman.
Green - Pretty useless, occasional pro-shot makes you feel like a demi-god.   Red - Homes on to the guy in front and fucks his shit up.  Blue - You're just about to win, meters from the line, in first place and this fucker descends on you like a peregrine falcon.
All season tires. 
All.men in video games are muscular and rugged. Better get some fatties up in that Shit. It's just so biased¡
So you can buy a house and have more room for ACTIVITIES!
im so very impressed by fnatic, i watched them ever since some tounament, which name i forgot, back in may 2011. and they weakend and weakend. But now it seems they are back
If you really have that many copies, I'd be glad to take some off your hands if you would like.
&gt; No one lives alone on this planet or in a small community of 5 people for the entire Earth.  What's immature is your misrepresentation of the philosophy. It doesn't say "every man for himself." It's simply saying that civil society can organize, solve problems, and people can *work together* without the coercive influence of politics.  &gt; Freedom without critical thinking is just a platitude.   Also, learn what platitude means before you start flinging insults.
Yeah, your nephew is seriously fucked up. He's going to kill someone, mark my words, your nephew is a murderer. Please somehow stop him before he kills someone.
MY 3DS is too quick at initializing the SD card, so I don't get to listen to the load music. A firth world problem if I ever heard one.
How does one become a lord of zombies?
Being crippled by something or bleeding out slowly after being stabbed or in a wreck. 
well, the announcement comes when someone buys the recipe, so...
There's a lot of stuff like this still being made.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=bBYKUDg7Jtc
World court... lol
Its fake, why do people keep posting this
In terms of personal finance, a twitch streamer with a youtube channel doesn't really need to pull as big numbers as a YT only producer.  The only person I know who's Twitch and YouTube are about even is Kripparian (the world first HC Diablo guy), and his twitch income has gone down as D3 viewership has had a pretty significant fall off (and he's playing WoW and PoE now).
She made a post on /r/ForeverAloneDating and I responded. We were both just looking for someone to chat with. We started talking and never really stopped talking. After talking for sometime we realized there was much more there and here we are today on our 8 month anniversary. 
The heartbreaking thing is when you realise Khali is the more accomplished worker of the two.
Aaaaaaaaand that's what happens when you ride a Penny board.
SLENDER MAN! shit run!
The joke here would be that he should be compensated for living in Canberrra.   I am not the one to make that joke. 
&gt;Is loud music really that big of a deal?  Big enough of a deal to shoot someone? Definitely not. Big enough of a deal to steal someone's keys? Not really. Big enough of a deal to merit reaching into someone's car and turning it off? Definitely.  Part of living in a society involves restricting your behavior to make things better for everyone. I love listening to loud music. But I also recognize other people don't share my taste so I turn my stereo down when I'm near other people. Because I'm not an asshole.  It's rude to blast your music in public. And it's especially rude to broadcast music laced with obscenities in a public place where other people's children might hear.  &gt;It seems as if people are losing/aren'tTaught the ability to simply deal with things that you don't like  It seems as if people are losing/aren't taught the ability to regulate their own behavior so as not to offend others. In a world where we're simply supposed to deal with things we don't like the biggest asshole wins.
It's a thin sheet of ice that you can't see, you basically lose control of your vehicle like hydroplaning, but worse. 
Justice has been served!  Edit: In February 1st 2014!
http://i1.kym-cdn.com/photos/images/newsfeed/000/389/150/774.png
Yes, seems like CLG and Zenith off the top of my head.
I wouldn't worry about it! 
Vampires and others who like little girl's necks?  :-/
I don't think any self respecting police officer would've charged you with anything just for that. You haven't hurt him, whereas he's a racist cockend. Good on you!
This is the upper side of average. If she keeps logging more and more hours into practicing this, and experiences the world in a way that inspires her, she can easily be above average. She has the skillset, now she just needs to hone it and hone it and if she's inspired she can be great.
"Suicide is not a choice.  It happens when pain exceeds the methods for coping with the pain."  Hopefully your uncle found peace.  Hopefully you and your family will find it, too, just by other means.
OP is a little late to the party...
I'd be hopeful about going to hell but I'm pretty sure its reserved for the whole of Israelites who will lobby for a state there too. 
thank you for turning my laughter to a coughing fit. (I have a cold)
I have about 250 hours on tf2 and around 50 on spy.
You can't be Daryl and Michonne. 
That is why we got: Bud switches, proximity detector, tripwires, pressure plates, glitches, bugs, particle detector and many more. You gotta be creative. Don't expect for everything to be given to you. You gotta build.
I am from a liberal area, and am somewhat used to having my knowledge taken seriously without (much) derision, but ran into a group of people recently who apparently weren't used to intelligent and confident women, because out of the blue, I was asked if I was a lesbian! I don't even have any of the stereotypical characteristics... So there is that.
recon that green is aluminum, blue is steel, orange is rubber?
That happened to me when I found out my local crack dealer accepted visa.
How Many Massachusetts Medical Marijuana Dispensaries Will Boston Get?
eat 1.5 - 2gs, wait 2 hours if you're not feeling it as much as you would like eat another g... the best way to have a good trip is to simply enjoy yourself &amp; not sketch out, remember it doesnt last very long :P
disregard previous statement, i decided to play a little bit more and it is actually really fun, it is NOT far cry 2 and the reviews are correct, its like skyrim.. with guns
I would do 2 grams.  A half bag is a great introduction, but I think to really meet the mushroom you should do 2 grams.  Also, you will be eating a proportionate amount to get the same trip as someone of a more average weight on an 1/8th. I recommend: go where you feel.  You may have a plan for your trip, but I would let the mushrooms decide what they want to do once you come up.  It will make the experience much more comfortable if you aren't trying to force your trip into a box.  These are beautiful little teachers, and they have to be approached as such.
I don't think the word ditto quite covers how happy I am to see you posting again. :-)
Surely nobody could read that tiny text on they're rear windshield whilst driving
downvote brigade? like asking people to downvote other users because I don't like their opinion? That's dumb what do karma scores have to do with the quality of the conversation?
They usually have around 5-20 people watching them though, typing comments and stuff. Sometimes the guy will be writing back to everyone. I prefer not to compete for their attention
Man....I use that train station all the time.
Sorry, I'm not seeing the sexism.  For the benefit of those of us with male privilege blinders, where is it evident?  Is there actually a lot or some isolated but triggering examples?
This is kinda funny~ :D
I'm pretty sure we were meant to meet to know that we're not alone in the world!!
There's not really going to be a container that a chick can access that a hen's beak can not.  Raised feed for the hens would keep the chicks out of the hen's feed at least. You just have to watch that they don't ignore that and eat the chicks' food.
Nothing gets by OP
I like rap.
Little Corn Island!  It's like a postcard Caribbean island where you can just... disconnect. The pace of life is so much slower and isolated from the tumult of the rest of the country (it's so small there are no roads and no cars). The coral reefs around are teeming with life and you can go scuba diving. And the lobster is delicious.
Hey fucker, the Internet is public.  If you have a problem with us Rigelic X47'ers you should say it to our faces.  Jackbag.
Same thing happened to me on the same mission, probably an engine fault because of the waves n' the storm.
I disagree.
It was just up and the server restarted. Was up again for about 5 minutes but now it is down again.  edit: Its up but it seems I'm having a connection problem.
haha, do the people being belayed know who tied the knots?
The current values for what the universe is made up of with the dark matter model are ~4% Baryons ("normal" matter) ~23% Dark Matter and ~73% Dark energy. That means that if black holes were to account for all this dark matter there would be about 6 times the observable mass of the universe as black holes. Also black holes we see only make up a small proportion of that 4%. Therefore we would see 6 x (mass of observable universe)/(predicted mass as blackholes) as many black holes if they also accounted for dark matter. This is also assuming the unpredicted ones have a comparable mass distribution.  Anywho it's a big number I just don't know the value of that fraction.
this list is great.
What actually fixed the three that you built?  I've built 3 as well and they have all worked on the first try
I really, really, really hate all beer. I've tried every conceivable type. I've done shot sized samples of dozens of them back to back and none of them are good. NONE OF THEM.
IMO the problem with this macro style 3-base mech is, that it is very hard to defend any protoss all-ins before you get a sizable tank (or thor if you prefer them, they're quite good early) army. Hell, even some sort of eco 6 gate pressure is quite scary.  Once you get solid mech ball and some ghosts to emp immortals/archons, mech isn't really that bad as people think, and protoss just can't engage directly (unless you screw up) and it actually quite reminds of broodwar as Sea showed us. :)
It's true, it's not that bad. But as long as people are unable to see a book as just a book written by men and not God and therefore aren't able to use their own minds to think rationally for themselves because the almighty book says something and that is the final word on the matter and even go so far as to indoctrinate their children before they are capable of forming their own ideas, then I would argue that it is in fact evil even if it does have some good ideas in it. Man... that was a horrible run on sentence... but I'm not fixing it either. haha
Sometimes I wonder if He created intelligent life here? :)
link?
Not yet, I started watching it a month or so ago on Netflix. I'm about half-way through season 7 right now. 
So this one is for the both of you. Being an aspiring actor myself, I want to make it big...I mean hey, don't we all? I'm 15, have been in two commercials (one local, one national) and am in plays all the time. I'm aware that right now I need to focus on school work, and I am, but I was curious if you two had any tips for how you got to where you are now? You're both such successful people in the industry I want so badly to be apart of. It saddened me when I saw you(Kev) say that you were no longer going to be making films, but I understand completely. What you've left us with is more than enough to last me a few life-cycles. Thanks for all your hard work in making such amazing work, and I look forward to seeing Jay and Silent Bob's adventures in the future.  extra question for Mr. Smith - What was it like working with John Goodman on the set of Red State? I really respect him as an actor.
then why make the post in the first place?
I'm getting the Bluetooth Beerbug.  Between this and the keezer I just started working on, this is going to be an exciting beer year for me!
It isn't.  The Spurs receive terrible NBA Finals tv ratings and its all about the money clearly. 
She's at the gym. But she prefers smart dudes.
Cunt
He convinced a prostitute to pay him.
This is what reddit looks like when Obama stops by for an AMA.
Agreed
my friends and i used to do this to joggers in our town, ive never heard of this happening anywhere else, thats awesome tho
Did they edit the article, because that's not what I read at all?  It's $6 /month to stream their entire library.  $.99/download for offline viewing.  
[](/this-r)
Actually, I think you should do that subreddit.  But like how parents tell us stuff that satisfy our curiosity well enough we just never think about it again until it makes us look like an idiot.  My friend is an aspiring stand-up and he just did a joke about how his dad told him artichoke hearts were chicken or whatever, and it only came back to bite him years later when someone offered him one and he said, "No, thanks, I don't like chicken."
He's also doing Prohibition grill in Everett
Sheer.
&gt; I cannot find a difference between dunking and not dunking
makes teachers look stupid this!
They have forcibly removed/killed/disenfranchised  the native people from the land. How is this not ethnic cleansing?   Ethnic cleansing - The mass expulsion or killing of members of an ethnic or religious group in a society.
Eh, my theory is that if you get robbed, the guy is going to take your cell phone so you don't immediately call the cops. So if your friend stays outside he'll have his phone.  But I'm overly paranoid so yeah.
Northern Ireland can't survive on its own, but nationalists there don't want to be independent, they want to be ruled by Ireland.
This comparison did two things:  it reminded me how terrific the original was, and also reminded me that the remake actually isn't that bad. I need to re-watch both.
Yeah let's all celebrate this guy being a complete cunt to some girl who wanted some genuine relationship advice. I hope the next time you really need a favor or advice or something from someone, they turn it into a Batman joke. 
And nether portal. And wood planks.
it took every single layer haha
[Dead! - My Chemical Romance](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ORsFFjt1x6Q)
Ok, but what about Aftermath?
Broncos fan in Kansas. Myth confirmed.
Comic Sans..
Just kill your mother ~~and~~ in law and you got the sword. How do you get the dog?
Awesome. Give us details! Is it yours? What was it like?
Five Guys trumps all when it comes down to it. I'm honestly not a big fan of In-N-Out. If Five Guys was open 24 hours I would end up looking like Mark Mangino.   You can also get HBCBs for breakfast, as Whataburger does breakfast menu from 11pm-11am. AWESOME!
If you turn off the lights do you still light up a room?
Yup. This has been in the game since CoD 4 and maybe CoD 2.
How do I know it's 'perfectly good food'?  Unless I buy it myself I'm going to assume it's tainted.  I can tell you've never been in a desperate type situation because  1) You wouldn't make it with the attitude of "just eat what's given to me" and  2) You're unable to grasp that a person is still prideful even when they've fallen that far down. Offering someone partially eaten food is not an act of charity.  The simple fact you refer to them as 'bums' indicates your ability to empathize is severely lacking.  Quite honestly, this is the only time I've ever felt the phrase "check your privilege" was needed to be said.
Well 2 of them are...
Maybe he means he's a pedophile by law? If he says he's a pedophile, then let him have the title...
The award isn't always supposed to be an honor. Example: read the article proclaiming Hitler the man of the year. That being said, I just don't quite see that dude causing a ruckus that will get in the way of his cheeseburgers in the coming years. 
I'm confused - I dont see any '.Je' in that image
xbox controller and is it a keyboard? IDFK a spaceship part?... 
This is a pretty rare shot, it's hard to find anything that's not a palm tree. Thx 4 the comment.
"Religion"
That's what these are for.  http://i.imgur.com/zv2HB.jpg
Hmmm...that's cool then. I just wish they weren't with Machinima. Why would you call a gaming content company "Machinima" anyway? That's like calling an animation studio "Animation". Or a "Cartoon" Cartoon...wait a minute... :o
One bolt is not good to TR off of. You always want redundancy when possible. There are exceptions to this, but rare outside of an alpine environment. Do you know what route they were on?  Cold fingers are a double edged sword. It's better than sweaty hands, but it's hard to grab onto those little nubs and crimps at smith with cold tips. Personally, I stick my hand under my balls while resting. Or I just deal with it.
Not sure if best, but here is another.  Digibet.com
I feel like the show has been a real journey.  So much has happened and so much has changed.  I went from just about hating all the characters (for being selfish, self centered, stupid, weak, etc.) to liking many of them.  I think the show itself has grown as well.  It's gone from long periods of nothing to non-stop drama and action.  Having a big budget helps, but I think the actors, writers and directors have grown as well.
i probably would've pulled out my phone and started recording her while walking to her car to get her license plate in case i came out to slashed tires or something. otherwise i might've told her to calm down, but i probably would've just ignored her. grabbing your gun would've been STUPID
Being in the basement by myself.
This is my safety concern kicking in - you really want your CPU fan to be 3-pin, and attached to the CPU fan slot on the mobo...  Sorry, I can't offer any fan suggestions, just thought I would add my concern.
Seems like my offer (without a buying agent) would be contingent on the seller's agent giving me a 1.5% rebate then.
if you never had the experience of getting presents as a child, do you think you would've been nearly as excited about Christmas? Do you think its meaning to you would have developed in the same way that it did? For me, the answer is no, Christmas would be totally different without presents.   Just think about how many non-Christians or non-practicing Christians celebrate Christmas (me, for example). Of course, like you said, it could be about consumerism or family, or both. But clearly Jesus rides backseat.  Ask even an educated child what Christmas is, and they'll tell you, "it's when you get presents from Santa... oh and by the way my sunday school teacher says it has something to do with Jesus too."
It took me a while to realize what it was.. but when I did I was like "woah". 
You should post this in the Parks and Rec subreddit! Awesome!
Urgh. Copyright censored. This whole, "asserting copyright because we're embarrassed" thing needs to stop.
We got our first heroic kill this week.  We had - 50% wipe 60% wipe 1.4% wipe then killed it on our 4th attempt.......he enraged and we didn't get loot and couldn't proceed.
"FUCK THE CROWN!"
&gt;So the problem isn't casual games, it's poorly designed introductions to a games mechanics.  I think you are wrong, and the problem is exactly the casual games made specially for gamers who cant play games in the first place. Its obvious if we examine the state of todays fps-games. They simply require BY FAR less from the player, than what proper fps-games did back in the days. QuakeWorld is a perfect example of a proper fps-game which is fully skillbased, few main differences compared to pretty much all todays fps games are:  - QW has fully skillbased movement which allows the player to gain speed while in the "modern" fps-games have no such thing, at best they have a "sprint button" or something along those lines  - the pace of the game is much faster compared to "modern" fps-games  - the weaponset in QW has multiple guns, and not all of em are hitscan weapons like in "modern" fps-games which means the player wasn't only to be able to pick the right gun in the given situation, he also had to be able to aim with guns which require prediction aim, not just spray&amp;pray  - in QW controlling the items in maps is very important, to a degree of requiring players to time items (including weapons/ammo/health/armors/powerups) to be able to secure the next spawn of the item - this system itself provides more possibilities for playing smart and requires by far more from the player than any tactical aspect in todays games  The reason i talk about "modern" fps-games is just that: they aren't modern what comes to the gameplay. They are actually the opposite, despite the eyecandy, and to me these "modern" fps-games are a perfect example of games made for those who cant play games.  If someone wants to see how these proper fps-games look when played by skilled players: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=cALELmIo8zk
I had always been skinny, still am really, but I'm talking at the beginning of this semester I was 5'9 and 125 pounds. I had somewhat consigned myself to the fact I was going to be skinny forever, until I decided that I had a terrible mentality, and began watching bodybuilding videos, mainly the train with Kai ones. I took a serious interest in bodybuilding and really looked into it, got into a sports performance class at school where we just lift, and started taking supplements. I am now 145 from the 125 and way stronger than what I was at in September, with no plans of stopping. 
Go to the zoo and take some up close photos of the tigers in the tiger cage
Or maybe they are somewhat well-fed?  I don't care who it is. If you are desperately hungry and in need of food then you aren't going to turn down something like peas because they don't taste good. These people simply weren't hungry enough or maybe those peas were beyond nasty and made them sick before.
I think it's more the guy is lucky the dude didn't steal his car and ram it into a wall. That's what he gets for being a dumb ass and leaving his keys in a running car when he goes into a store.
Cute.  One of the best dog breeds.  Enjoy.  Take lots of pictures when the guy is little.  They are only that small once.  I took a ton and still wish I had taken more.
TThat's like a small version of YOUR penis. Glad to see you back 
DAE DUKAKIS/???
The best solution I believe would be [bluestacks](http://bluestacks.com/). It makes a Library and has links to all of the Apps you have installed and you can even pin them to the start.
Yay overpriced consulting firms!
iTunes only sucks on Windows. Imagine going to work for Apple and then being told you are developing for Windows. Seriously, I bet they do it as punishment.
Can anyone please explain to me what this Warlord Games is about? They seem to have some great models but why are they called 28mm? Are they all the same size? :O
I can't even handle this. 
So will [Block Poster](http://www.blockposters.com/step1.aspx)
well aside from the fact that the 2012 budget marks it as 683 billion, which doesn't round to 600 billion- its not just a matter of "The military creates jobs therefore its a good investment" its a matter of "where will a portion of that money" do the most good- going by studies like ( http://www.peri.umass.edu/fileadmin/pdf/published_study/spending_priorities_PERI.pdf ) that place isn't the military, no one is suggesting that the military be done away with utterly- but many of our bases in relatively quiet areas of the world (of which we do have many) are unnecessary and drain resources- many of the expenditures on things like tanks, for example, have even been outright contested by the military as they already have more than they require active.   Furthermore, its likely that increased spending in other areas of the budget would result in a larger net gain in the military's effectiveness than immediate military spending. Spending more on education for instance would not only result in more effective engineers and the like for the military, but also accelerate the rate of technological growth- potentially giving us a remarkable advantage, cheapening the cost of doing many things we already know how to do, and contributing to medical advancements that could play a pivotal role in keeping our troops alive.   Finally- there's very little that things like more fighter planes, tanks, and missiles can protect you from. Our military is already large enough and powerful enough to take out just about any country on the planet (indeed, we own most of the aircraft carriers in existence- and all of the big ones), when we enter a war, we become the dominant occupying force in the space of about 3 weeks- our conventional forces are beyond sufficient for any task we might choose to set them to. We have just about every other developed (and therefore powerful) nation on the planet as our allies, including the majority of Europe (see NATO). In most conflicts in fact, the U.N is on our side- under our finger in many ways. We easily posses the largest, most well-trained, most technologically advanced force in the world- forget big, it's outright bloated.  The trouble is non-conventional warfare, the number of tanks and soldiers we can field is nothing when a few nukes in the hands of people who don't care about deterrence could literally cause the end of the world- certainly annihilate the country- and nothing we have is an adequate defense for that- in fact, the only real defense against the threat of nuclear attack- is that of mutual disarmament and cooperation. a larger military budget- beyond say 3-4% of our current GDP, does nothing to help keep you safe, and might even serve make your life more dangerous. 
I get it now! Okay :D I thought you were being serious, haha.
Snow days are either awesome or fucking terrible. Where I live I swear you never get just a few inches anymore its just icy roads or you end up without power for a weeks. 
Write everything down, no seriously, everything. Repeat orders back to customers after you've taken them, that's for your benefit and theirs. Someone said always bring back change, I've found if you say, "I'll be right back with this" when they hand you the check, if they don't want change they will tell you. Never only walk by one of your tables, wall by them all. Help other servers out when their in the weeds, they will help you out later. Make as few trips as possible. If you get double sat greet one table and make eye contact with the other then take both drink orders. Never hassle the cooks or bartenders, don't hang out at the hostess stand. Keep your tables in the loop if their order is running long. Sorry for the formatting, if you have anymore questions please feel free to pm me
Dietrich Bonhoeffer  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dietrich_Bonhoeffer
after women come, they want more. after men come, they get instantly un-horny. trust me, I have ejaculated to gay porn and I felt so disgusted afterwards, maybe that's why.
no love for the wok? robocoupe would be a better food processor. 
Anything that doesn't praise socialism or Obama does. That's why we, myself being a libertarian, lurk my friend. 
Just give him the Forest Whitaker eye.  Oh that's good...
I own RVP and Suarez, but I'm definitely captaining Suarez.   Home to Southampton is too juicy.
Hello! Each day gets more awesome as it goes!  [](/discordquite "I like emotes as well")
The teacher wrote 3 bonus questions on the board for them to copy.
Is this game really that bad ?
Don't worry they take lardasstic POS and get them tuned all the time.
Reddit loves pretentious assholes like him and Bill Hicks
its so true haha
¿Por qué no los dos?
I agree... I think people should be able to still post them, but a warning would be nice. Then those of us that are sensitive to them know not to read.
No
No, no nonono. He was saying that your cool is cool. 
Love Erandur.  He's so nice and then the next minute... *I'll see you burn!*
Except the average player is not finding a thousand useful items each day, so when he finally finds one, its worth is almost shit because the market is flooded with items. GTFO with your stupid assumptions!  The only persons who are not affect by bots are those that do not trade at all, but those are the minority inside the game.
The very apple on which Adam and Eve dined was probably the result of extensive breeding, otherwise they might have remarked on its bitterness, sworn off apples for good, and changed the course of history forever.
Bo turned 50 Today!
He's utterly unfunny in the first one.  He wasn't given a whole lot of opportunity, though.
Highway to Hell -ACDC, reason goes without saying haha
multidisciplinary undergrad (industrial &amp; business focus) and industrial grad. I manage a lot of cross-functional teams; worked on a lot of awesome projects, never with a civil though, and I have hard, verbatim, "Sorry, we build products that move" told to civils by fortune 500 executives. It's cool if you want to develop buildings or work for the government.
Oh my goodnesss you have big hands. I could do this with a budgie, maybe. LOL 
Alaska has to be my state of mind.
Worst: Our entire 2008 draft. Giving the Falcons our 1st round pick for two 2nd round picks. In which we got Devin Thomas and Malcolm Kelly. The next "big" WR tandem that completely and utterly failed. I don't think we have anyone still on the team from that draft class  Best: Time will tell, but right now it's looking like Bob the 3rd was a homerun  EDIT: Fred Davis was also chosen in the 2nd round of the 08 draft. We had 3 picks in the 2nd round. 
CALL US WHEN YOU HAVE MORE CHAMPIONSHIPS THAN THE UNIVERSITY OF NO HARDWARE
This is a cool idea, but haven't most D&amp;D style games made the dungeon master obsolete?  If the game already has the stories and maps generated, why would anyone need to be DM?  Not saying it wouldn't be cool, just seems like most video gamers now aren't really the same audience that plays or played pen-and-paper games and this may seem like a step backward in a way.
Let's say you and I go toe to toe on bird law and see who comes out the victor.
It wasn't really the gayness of the villain, but Bond's response that had me shaking my head.  "What makes you think I haven't?"  Ugh.  &gt; I'm also not sold on trying to give background to Bond. He doesn't need it, the character itself is like 50 years old at this point. We know who Bond is. He's supposed to be a pseudo-mysterious individual.  This is exactly what I was trying to say.
I guess I am here now.  I am one of the new writers and patron saint of srotd, river crossings and anemones.
I think the whole Krillin willing to sacrifice himself for the good of everyone makes him a much better person to me.
how long are they? do you comb them? perhaps style them a little bit? if, by some drunken mad accident, some were burnt off or something, would you get a genital comb-over to mask the lack of your pubic jungle?
Where do you download the maps? I don't have that many friends that play halo. 
It's cognitive dissonance. It's been drilled into our heads for so long that sex crimes are perpetuated by men that some people can't handle the idea that it's not always true.  The more intrinsic something is to someone's core beliefs, the more they are inclined to reject, dismiss or minimize any evidence that contradicts their view.
I don't know what it means but some one should figure this shit out quick!
Is the second one a calculator? something like the TI-83? :P
So there may be hope.
Possibly could have just suffered from a bad romance
Rubick / Invoker flairs make this so much better
http://wiki.teamfortress.com/wiki/Saxxy_Clapper_Badge
Laughed at your second paragraph.
But there is no engie bot...
Very possible. I just meant that it's funny because telling people to sign up for gold accounts used to be a big trolling thing, but now it's actually kind of legitimate, so the joke becomes a bit muddled.
Pulp Feelction? 
WHY does Nintendo sacrifice the integrity of so many old franchises and so many new possibilities by catering to everyone? Restricting something to guide it's growth is a good thing! Haikus are beautiful because of the limits placed on them!
No, Russia.
Thanks to the new move tutors I just taught mine Dual Chop. xD But Ice Punch, I like the way you think. 
Back when I was one of only about 3/20 teenagers I knew who found blink 182 repulsive instead of hilarious, I was pretty sure that I still would have religion aside.
The most magical place in Planetside 2.  One of the few places set up like a proper defensible location.  It is fun sometimes because it is usually under siege by one side or the other, and direct attacks take a massive effort.  The otehr day I pulled a Prowler tank set with HE cannons, and then proceeded to spend about 30 minutes nonstop killing NC that were moving up to the Crown.  Literally I did not stop firing and had a nearby sunderer to reload when I was out of ammo.  Ended up with ~130 certs just from that one fight.  As others mentioned it is like a meat grinder but mainly it is because there are *always* targets to fire at around the Crown.  Plus, having the Crown makes it rather easy to take any of the ~6 bases around it that have a pretty widespread effect on the map.
[](/rpinkamina)&amp;nbsp;  &amp;nbsp;   ^^Or
No doubt. Just needs to buckle down that mid range shot.
Well,it was supposed to be an obvious troll. Considering that you got that I was trolling, and therfore didn't mean it at all...I don't see what the problem is. 
Colby 2012
Case in point: I accidentally ran over my mosin after leaning it on the tailgate of the truck.  Still shoots as straight as ever.
when my nephew was small, he went through a stage where he wouldn't drink milk, only juice. this freaked my sister out to no end, so, i told her not to worry, that i'd get him to drink it.  naturally, she didn't believe me.  so....i walk into the living room and ask nephew if he wants some juice - he says yes - i say, stay here, i'll go get it.  i poured a cup of milk, added a bit of green food coloring and presented it to him as "cactus juice."  he drank the whole thing and asked for more.  
Thanks a bunch /u/TheonlyFalala!   Edit:Sorry for the misspell Buckin' keboard...
Who.... Does.... Number....two.... Work....for???
When I first poked my head into this sub, everything really seemed like a joke. There was a satirical feeling to this notion of being discriminated against for being better than the average man. Now it seems, it has devolved into a sackless, pity party. "Oh, someone doesn't appreciate all the work I do, even though what I do is really for me anyway." Get the fuck over it. You claim to go to Brodin's temple and have the heart and strength to bang out 500lb squats but the fat bitch secretary at your office pokes a little fun at your pecs and you cry like a 5 year old with a skinned knee. Gimme a fucking break.
I'd say Sacha Baron Cohen.
I look forward to it. 
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=uMoIxjMYRmY I'm not really a big country fan but.....
Here is what the linked Quickmeme image says in case the site goes down or you can't reach it: &gt;Title: I almost shat myself &gt;Meme: Socially Awesome Penguin &gt;* FINALLY FIND COURAGE TO TALK TO CUTE GIRL AT WORK  &gt;* SHE MAKES A VIDEO GAME REFERENCE BEFORE ME &gt;^〘[Direct](http://i.qkme.me/3rzhz1.jpg)〙 ^〘[Background](http://imgur.com/p0rGd)〙 ^〘[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||FINALLY+FIND+COURAGE+TO+TALK+TO+CUTE+GIRL+AT+WORK+-+SHE+MAKES+A+VIDEO+GAME+REFERENCE+BEFORE+ME)〙 [FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/) ┊ [More Info](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/) ┊ AMA: [Bot](http://www.reddit.com/r/self/comments/vxeak/hello_i_am_a_bot_who_posts_transcriptions_of/), [Human](http://www.reddit.com/r/InternetAMA/comments/12gog9/i_am_the_creator_of_qkme_transcriber_a_definitely/)
Whoa....all those suit wearing, door knocking Jehovas and Mormons are trying to get people back into the matrix of religion and ignorance...they're all agents...
A frat brother athlete bragging about his ability to lay sororisluts is sort of like Friedrich Gauss bragging about his ability to do with simple arithmetic with single digit numbers.  Those of us without access to fraternity membership and athletic looks got nothing out of this FR.
To be fair, Nikon has also kept the same mount, so i would say that they and Pentax are similar in backwards compatibility.
*It gets called being clingy a lot*  Exactly. This is not "clingy" this is called being respectful of your partner.
This looks like the location where that guy gets killed on a boat in Godfather. Anyone else see it?
They were most definitely focused on fame. There's a documentary (on Netflix!) called Dark Side of the Moon which explains this quite well. (DSotM came out before Wish You Were Here, but they clearly were doing it for fame and fortune.)
At first I thought it was a quest but I checked and there was nothing ;_;
Hockey, not the sport, not the fans, not the love for it. The fact its what we are known for and the fact that any marketing team pushing a product in Canada had a 75% of using hockey in the commercial. Makes me go mental. 
Say you've had some extreme loss of appetite and your friend told you adderall is better for it.
True enough.  His isn't lowered (or at least it doesn't look like it).  I always had to run some 2x4s right at the beginning of the slope so my bumper would clear on my '95.
try 11 before replying. 
Level 100 too.
Interesting question and sort of relevant to something that just happened.  We had an indie movie shooting in our house for a few days.  They wrapped up on Tuesday.  In the movie, there's a masturbation scene with a 14-yr-old actress.  I imagine that they have to tread a fine line with that sort of thing.  They covered up all the monitors outside the bedroom during that scene so that only the on-set crew could watch.  I assume that this was to make the actress more comfortable, though I was thinking to myself "What are you doing in there with that kid that your adult crew can't see and should I be kicking you out of my house..."  Edit:  Answering some questions from below:  The movie is [Sisterhood of Night](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt1015471/)  As far as I know, everyone is clothed in the movie.  The movie that shot at my other house in Philly was National Treasure starring (brace yourselves, reddit) Nicholas Cage.
That's just....horrible.  Why did I click the link?  Why?
Yep i am doing 10 min kms now aiming at 5k in 30mins within 6 months.
Me.
Tally ho Francis, it seems I will be in need of my portable rain hood also. Make it snappy, god's will be done.
they're a bunch of fucking jews
Never in my life was I more compelled to yell 'no shit' at my television set.
Fisken, our school district sucked. What are you talking about?
Get the two from the website. Only costs you a fiver. Then get a large hard disk.
&gt;It's like choking out a metallic pig.  Best.  description.  ever.
Beacuse I want my liver to know who's boss. 
http://www.forbes.com/sites/darrenheitner/2012/11/30/does-david-sterns-250000-fine-against-the-spurs-jeopardize-the-integrity-of-the-nba/
They could of just smoked some trees, and meant "You SEE better with your glasses on."
Easy number 1 is Yuno Gasai the Yandere Queen 2 Deus ex machina ( dat looks and dat voice)
Aaron is always fun to see there.
The second pic is admittedly better. It's the first and the fourth that I take issue with.
http://www.time.com/time/specials/packages/article/0,28804,2128881_2129111_2129112,00.html
It seems that you've misinterpreted my posts. I'm not trying to make it into a competition, and any time I've talked about it with him I haven't been accusing or manipulative by bringing up how much I do it for him (as I said in my post, I try and frame it as "it's awesome when you do this and this, why don't you do it more?"). At this point I would be happy with him fingering me once a week, which, given the frequency of the sex we have, I don't believe is an unreasonable request.  I like giving him blow jobs because I know he enjoys them. I see it as a standard part of an active sex life. I know enthusiasm is the best thing you can have in a partner, so I am as enthusiastic as one can possibly be when gagging on a dick. It's not a pleasant sensation for me, but I take pride in doing a fantastic job and pleasuring him and I enjoy seeing him happy.  My problem is that enthusiasm isn't reciprocated. In the entire time we've been having sex, he's gone down on me seven times before sex, and has fingered me maybe three or four total (I'm not trying to tally it, but they stick out because they are so infrequent). Only two of the times he's fingered me has he put in the effort to bring me to orgasm. The disproportionate level of effort going into our sex life is what's upsetting me, and what I'd like to work on constructively.
And by giving SRS the benefit of the doubt instead of saying something like "except SRS amirite", you've supported the genuine kindness theory.  
Great photographs! Beautiful lighting and toning in each one. You have a good thing going for yah!
This was it, thank you!
Women spend their entire lives being bombarded with images of "ideal" bodies. That's bad enough. But to get it from your boyfriend and his friends? Agonizing.   Also it's shady as fuck that 1. This guy is sharing stuff like this and 2. Surrounds himself with scumbags who would message the girl. So many red flags. 
I know this isn't the place for this kind of stuff, but maybe this time: JEW
its pending right now to someone else. Would you be interested in a very rare gtx 480 lightning by msi? It performs about the same as a gtx 580
No, they're not.  It's currently 11:00 am 31th of November for habitants of Sydney, Australia.  Their year started on January 1st at 12:00 am.  It's been 335 days and 11 hours since they started their year.  It's currently 7:00 pm, 30th of November for habitants of New York.  Their year started on January 1st at 12:00 am.  It's been 334 days and 19 hours since they started their year.
No, it truly was Harry Potter -- it only required his magic underwear and the destruction of the Hoar Crux to release the budget.
[No.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=yg2u_De8j5o)
***You should be, your horrible person!***   &lt;/joke&gt;
We apologize for the inconvenience, but your post has been removed because it is an image, and images are not allowed in this subreddit. Please post this to /r/cringepics.  Thank you.  *[I am a bot](http://www.reddit.com/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fcringe) if you have any questions or concerns.*
30 second timer starts ticking.....   **Me: Okay team, we do we want to try to take out their scouts or shall we attempt to lure the enemy into an ambush?**   Teammate 2 randomly pings the minimap.  Teammate 1: Shutup fag.   Teammate 2 randomly pings the minimap.  Teammate 3: wat  Teammate 2 randomly pings the minimap.  Teammate 4: I'm tier 3, why am I in this tier 5 battle?  Teammate 2 randomly pings the minimap.
...yes, but are there chocobos?
Makes some fine microbacon too
&gt;Lebron loves winning and all, but I doubt he would have taken half of his current contract to still play for the Heat.  They're actually all losing a shit ton of money. I don't know of much people who would pass on so much money just for success in sports.  &gt;And to avoid the "superteam" why not enact rules that make it so a team can only have one max contract or anywhere near one.  I thing the cap rules are enough. If players are ok with taking less money and some front offices do better work than other, then it should be so.  &gt;Besides, avoiding injuries is supposed to be one of the top priorities of the NBA, as well as the NBAPA.  Well, I think there's a difference between running your players in the ground like Thibeaudo or sitting your starting five out.   &gt; No solid free agent will want to sign there because they suck, they suck because they can't get any decent players.  Well, in leagues where the priority is sport and not only business, that's how it goes. Some teams are advantaged, because they have a bigger area supporting them and others have to do with smaller budgets. I mean it's more or less the same now: add the titles won by the big dogs (Lakers, Celtics, Bulls, ...) and it's not that different.
I have sent messages but have gotten no response?
*try*
Yeah but I heard "catchers" get paid more
Aliens run that Wrestling thing? I KNEW IT!
Well, you're probably an asshole, and I doubt people really like you.  If that's how you choose to be, go ahead.  I'm just advising you  on how a regular human being should act.  Signing off.
Cosmopolitan or Watermelon Mint?
Well sheeeit
Since when can you *purchase* things from VLC? 
Wait - didn't they promise they would get a million signatures?  This should be on r/cringe.
We can however get higher draft picks. 
Thought you were being a little bit racist until the end...I was all like "why does it matter that es black?"
CombatEX really cleaned himself up and is now even playing in the WCG, that is alot to give the guy. I would be surprised if anyone can still say he is a no good stream-sniper.^^^He ^^^still ^^^bms ^^^in ^^^game ^^^tho
Man Overboard by Blink-182. I love drinking, and I realized it's a problem so I stopped. 
Hell the fuck?
Like everyone else has said, it's varies from writer to writer. I don't think there are necessarily any "cons" to any approach.   I usually make sure I have a basic outline written out, nothing too detailed. One page at the most that says where I'd like the story to go and how I'd like things to end, but it's never set it stone. From there, I write whatever scene comes into my mind. I don't worry too much about the order in which I write things because I know whatever I write the first few times will be crap, and I can always combine everything later on and edit things so they make sense contextually. 
But does an ISP have the right to shut off your access to a website it dislikes?
You don't buy a ticket expecting x y and z to play. You buy the team with that hope. They could all have really not been able to play and you would've been fine with it as a fan. I see no reason to be upset with them for looking out for the future.
It was just data.
But duuuuude,   God is just the everything-nothing that has a whole bunch of definable traits/infinitely simple/ impossible poetry!?  .... in your *heart*.
FFVII is one of my favourite games, so I thought to include it, especially since it had an example like this. 
I think it's even more bad ass that he didn't hit him, because it makes the guy look like more of a pussy for flinching all hard.
Have you noticed if players are more likely to collaborate on mic?
More like sharks with frickin lasers on their heads
First, I just want to say that if Israel does end up hosting the u21 Euros, I hope they do so successfully and without any violent events. However, people are crazy. You and I recognize that attacking an international sport competition will bring no good for both Palestinians and Israelis, but Hamas could see it as an opportunity to make a big statement in a global scheme. I am also aware of Israel's world-class security force; however, a festive tournament such as a European Championship should not be played in a situation where military forces must be on duty to protect fans.   **Just because Israel can call upon an extensive security force does not negate disaster threats**   Currently, it just seems like a poor idea to host a multi-national tournament in Israel, and it is a shame that it is so. Finally, after considering the opportunity for such a threat to occur, why risk thousands of lives so Israel can host a bloody tournament?  
It doesn't matter. Once you mention the "a" word their interest and your sex appeal both drop 50%.
I just want to marry Doublelift.
So little food can actually work against you too. Try Grapefruit juice (potentiator) and fast for only about 5 hours before.  It should be a lucid experience. Some people "look" for the high so much they miss out on it. Any chance of that being at least part of it? 
Ah yes, take the advice of the 12 year old still using text speak...
Does anyone else find this a little creepy? I'm not scared of water, but something about that huge expanse of pristine blue freaks me out.
I find it very unlikely that behavior like that would be common. That sounds much more like a sensationalist anecdote. Everyone has narcissistic tendencies, it's just how they choose to express them. Even jesus christ liked to glorify his own name. The guy thought he was god's son for god's sakes, and were supposed to take him as a moral authority.  
I'm sorry you've had this experience :( Ever since I started smoking when I was about 19 I've usually been the only girl, and at first the guys were kinda weird about it because they thought I was just the girlfriend of their friend (but now we're married and he doesn't talk to most of them... so THERE! lol) and that I wasn't really a "true" smoker. Are you in college or planning on going? It can be a great place to meet some other female ents, or even just cool male ents that don't have a weird thing about girls smoking. I'm hoping things look up for you and get better! Just keep your head up high (lol) and all will be well :)
Scoring is much easier than it was before. A lot of violent contact allowed in the 70's is not allowed now. Players are faster and more skilled. The game is faster.  It's harder to get shut out now than it was in 1975 because the quality of offensive play has improved.
Bro, changing multiple things at a time is the BEST feeling in the world. It's like a drug itself. Eating healthy and exercising has made me feel like superman. I'm 25 pounds down from 315 to 290 and I can't wait to lose another 25. I can already see the results in my face. One huge thing that's helped me is to make SMARTER food decisions. Not genius decisions - just a notch healthier than usual. For example instead of a sausage biscuit for breakfast I would have oatmeal with sweetener or two apples. Lunch I eat a lot of rice, beans, chicken, salsa, cheese, relatively healthy items (compared to pizza, or burgers, etc) and when I want something yummy like pasta I'll go for marinara sauce instead of high calorie fattening Alfredo sauce. Little changes like this aren't difficult.. And they add up! I also bought a bike and started biking to work every day. It's only a mike or so - but biking for 10 minutes in traffic every morning and evening gives me TONS more energy throughout the day, raises my heart rate for a bit, and it's fun!
http://media.tumblr.com/tumblr_mb90ajJo821rw5rky.gif
Please. Who else would you want playing She-Hulk in the Avengers XXX Parody?
Eh, there's a middle ground. Just as all middle-men don't necessarily add value in th retail world, the same is true in banking. But don't discount everything, as that just shows you don't understand what is going on.
Or vets in training?
If you've ever played Zelda 64 on the Nintendo 64, the Water Temple is a nightmare.  You have to keep raising or lowering the water level, and you can only do the things that are accessible to the level the water is now, so if you miss a key or something before you change the water level again, you will be stuck for hours.  My brother and I would joke that we were going to pick up a day laborer to do the Water Temple for us.  Little did I know that Chinese gold farmers would soon actually exist - people in China will play World of Warcraft for you for money, and make your character more powerful and get it gold and weapons and stuff.
&gt; Doesn't being in one soak up enough time as it is?  [](/nmm) You humans and your linear perception of space-time!
They have an official pokedex app in Japan, so I wouldn't completely rule it out.
I was scheming to make tons of accounts, just to get my upvotes. But wrote this instead. I would really much like to have such humble bundle, i love games(even thought my pc is kinda sucky),  but low resolution has never ever stopped me from enjoying games. I promise to take good care of a bundle if i am to receive one. Thank you in advance,and happy holidays!
Look closer.
I don't think it's that cut and dry. Maybe the laffer curve is suspect but many economists argue that raising taxes does not increase revenue.   http://m.theatlantic.com/business/archive/2012/09/tax-cuts-dont-lead-to-economic-growth-a-new-65-year-study-finds/262438/
I honestly don't understand this stance against abortion, and I'm a republican. Same with the stance against gays.  If I've set it once, I've said it a thousand times. Religion and politics DO NOT mix.
Sad. I feel that way about a lot of Hillsong songs and have to check myself.
It's happening slowly.
7pm Eastern Time Zone here; Still no code.
He calls this one "Ice Cream Habit #3".
What really rumbles my feathers is why do we allow israel to host a eutopean tournament.  If we want to keep politics aside then geographically, middle eastern countries should play they own tournaments.  But we accept israel for political reasons.   Then if we actually consider politics.... The Gaza situation should deny israel from bein host in any competition.  We have 2 choices and both deny israel from being host.
You're absolutely right, I thought of that while posting it. At first I was hesitant and then I hoped no one would notice and posted any ways. 
I like how he's pointing. It makes him look pretty badass. Nice work.
Sorry, this breaks rule #4 from the sidebar.
This submission has been automatically removed due to linking to an unapproved domain. Please re-upload the image to a quality image host such as [imgur](http://imgur.com) or [minus](http://minus.com) and resubmit.  *[I am a bot](http://www.reddit.com/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fgentlemanboners) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Yeah, I think I'll shift my focus back a few years... Probably shy away from the 80's in favor of the latter part of the 60's.
We have seen mixed results with apple entering these markets. India was a lot better than Africa. We also have seen a massive level of Iproduct ripoffs and counterfeits already in China.   The real question is the realizable sales and we will have to wait and see what that looks like compared to their otherwise slowing growth. I expect marginal gains from this compared with what one might expect from such a large population gaining access to their products. (I would not buy apple based on this market, but we will see!)
I have the same problem on my mac using safari. I have found that switching to a diferent browser is the solution. Along with switching browsers you can also visit youtube, or if your a sponser you can download it if its available.
Kill us all by twista. Nah, really though, that's a hard decision, lot of songs out there. *Maybe* (just maybe) "show goes on"  by Lupe Fiasco, as I have a lot of younger siblings, and I plan on teaching them as much as I can before I go out, so I want them not to remember what I looked like at my death, but what I showed them when I was alive.
dynamic movements, one arm lock offs. Those are two skills that you will develop over time.   For now, concentrate on getting as much continuous climbing done until you have a bunch of good skills. Doesn't matter the difficulty, just do problems you can finish! That will help you more than figuring out one move per 3h session. 
as a showing of appreciation im going to upvote all your links and comments
I'll just try to answer questions here. I don't think I'm AMA material yet, although there is actually a completely true element of this story I left out because I was afraid people would not believe it, and thus not believe anything else either 
Isn't derp a word with a negative connotation?
* Borderlands 2  * XCOM   * Syndicate   * L4D4   * The Last Story
I saw it on a travel channel show, the ocean there is too cold and the currents are too strong to swim in so they built this
They're massively revamping that exit and adding another to relieve the congestion. Not that I want an outlet mall there...Just moved back to the area and it's already built up enough.
Actually you can simple cut the drive bay in half since the fan controller is shorter than a optical drive and then fit a fan controller and your rad.  Me? I simply ordered a 200mm cooler master fan that came with a molex to 4 pin adapter. Then I used the header to power the 200m intake on the front and the molex to power the exhaust fan on the back.
That's such BS, and hardly makes sense. You can Trick or Treat but there's no Christmas tree? Come on!
Hershey's Cocoa powder. 2 tbsp  Edit: Sugar 4 tbsp  Heated 2% (or 1%) milk ~6oz  Butterscotch Schnapps &amp; Peppermint Schnapps ~2oz (combined)  Dark Spiced Rum (Kraken) ~1oz  Garnish with candy cane.
Except that they rebelled several times before Santa Anna came in to power, they supported him in one of those rebellions.
A giraffe biting his lip with sunglasses on looking at a female giraffe 
Yeah i forgot about the other arm n'stuff. But still ... 100 pount bow seems to be equivalent to lets 30-50 pounds lift. Thats still quite a lot. Especially if required a dozen or more times in a short time.
As did I, when I had interns. Good days.  Sometimes I know in advance, others I don't. It's really just a difficult situation.
Here are my thoughts on it all: http://www.gamingonlinux.com/index.php?threads/humble-not-so-friendly-anymore-bundle.1490/
Upvote because I like awkward boner stories. 
strange short circuit.
faggotsayswhat
That's incredibly fake. You can see the outline around the person as they go past the blue and white. It's just after effects.  Oh, and the sound effects gave it away, too.
...shit.
Now you're gonna get it Bobby.
Have you tried iTools?
Edina area...like France and 100MN. It's been great for me!  I'm glad your symptoms are managed though! :)
I may be in the same boat as you.  Does Flower Honey count as part of the requirement?  Edit: Flower Honey and Honey both work.  I just move onto Renovation #3!
Ok so it looks like it flopped. Does anyone have a reason for this? Was it just a strange looking movie that people were hesitant to invest money in?
Well, this is a depressing day for music.
Hm. I shouldn't be here... Good to know, thanks. 
Besides a few fan pics, Wilson hasn't been in the public spotlight since the parade. His agent/publicist is trying to rework Wilson's negative attention whore image. They realized this Free Agency was inevitable a month ago. 
It's a glitch but, Hold alt, Open the hordric cube, Let go of alt. Make sure not to press it again or else it turns off. 
Well they haven't learned anything because we cheer cm punk relentlessly 
http://www.time.com/time/specials/packages/article/0,28804,2128881_2129111_2129112,00.html
A militia and some random psychopath who demands to bring a gun everywhere are not the same thing.  Militias are organized.  You're just a gun nut.
It's just a repost from the 2nd most upvoted post in this subreddit. More infos / pics here http://www.reddit.com/r/mathpics/comments/gk6e2/the_beauty_of_roots/
No, that's a bear in a bee costume.
1000 yen? That's a rip off
Which one was this? Do you have a link or anything?
I agree. Even if there is a shortage here, it means wages will rise for those of us in the industry and that will attract more Americans into STEM. I found it hard to find a job as it was with all the H1B visa people. Would be even harder having to compete with even more Indians and Chinese.
Anything *with* Will Ferrell in it.
Grow up.
they [are](http://www.reddit.com/r/WTF/comments/142ub4/fifty5_shades_of_grey_nsfw/) 
&gt;You have to take into consideration that the Gulf of Mexico is a huge body of water, and **can probably take the impact of a few million barrels of oil and few million gallons of dispersant.**  What are you basing this assumption on? Do you know, for example, that the dispersant will cause the oil and dispersant to uniformly diffuse across the Gulf? Is it likely to accumulate in certain regions?
&gt; This sub reddit is not a replacement for local emergency services, **legal consultation**, medical consultation, missing persons inquiries, charity drives, or homework help. These types of posts will be removed
Good Ole' WWE wasting potential PPV matches for Smachdown of all things. Its like they just dont understand what we want. Now that I know it wont be at TLC I wont even buy it. 
This.
Our high school had a courtyard outside the cafeteria that was known as the "senior courtyard." Meaning you could expect trouble going there if you were anything but a senior. This was in March in Massachusetts on the first nice day in about six months. A few freshman friends and I decided we felt like eating outside in the courtyard. We took a seat at one of the picnic benches and starting eating and talking, keeping to ourselves. Some senior yells "fuckin' freshman," and a group of them laugh and try to look tough when we look up. We ignore them and keep talking and eating. Next thing I know there is something flying through air about to hit my friend in the head. Mid-sentence, without breaking my speaking stride, I reach up, without taking my eyes off the person I was talking to, and snatch the glass Snapple bottle one-handed and put it down on the table. I proceed to act like nothing even happened, and the senior who threw it walks away with his head down. We never got any shit again, and from that day on, the courtyard was "integrated."
C'est un dieu.
Wait a minute, wait a minute.  I forgot Roddy White was a fucking outstanding receiver under Vick's tenure. Oh, what's that? He wasn't?  So Tom Brady makes all these guys elite because he's Tom Brady  But it couldn't POSSIBLY be (outside of Tony G, that I give you) that Matt Ryan made Roddy White an elite receiver?  Ok.
I disagree and I'll use one example:  WoW is the most successful MMO at the moment. It definitely has a learning curve if you wish to do anything competitively. 
I shall do that the next time I get the chance. Thanks for the suggestion.
Sadly, my  ey is not woring
[Here!](http://gopro.com/support/article/?22164538)
Why not sell it or trade it for a bass you do like the sound of?
I was walking to the bus from my apartment to go to a photoshoot downtown (I live in Chicago) when guy approached me and tried to steal my purse. Instinctively I punched him and swiped his hand away and kept walking. Half way through the bus ride I realized I probably should have reported him.   I'm a 24 year old female. 
Then what? Give into your cynicism and stop trying? Stop fighting ?
For the sake of argument? What a crap argument.  And you are claiming no one has 100% integrity. Wow that's fucking genius. You're arguing that we should listen carefully to paedophiles because they may have something of value to impart. Personally i wouldn't waste my time talking to someone with such a bad record while you claim to listen to your parents like they were paedophiles cause chances are, because they lied about santa, they're going to rape you in the ass.  I also never claimed intent overrides integrity. But there are degrees of integrity. Everyone lies. Honey you look great, yes that's all i owe on taxes. Claiming like for like with, 'i didn't fuck the kids' is an intellectually masturbatory moronic game.  Wanker.
Why not both? 
Radioactive Giant Mutant Lemons.  They are filled with sour goodness and a fuck ton of CANCER.
And sadly, some get corrupted, but other's don't.  My ex's father was a cop, and he would bitch about some of his colleagues doing some underhanded things.  So it lies on the person who takes the roll too.
I've seen enough hentai to know where this is going.....
cleaning off some of the shelves now but all in all, liking it so far.
pfft.  *you* don't belong here.
Hm, that does make it a bit more challenging. Are you in a very tech-oriented area?
Unless you're a woman
Most 7-11 you can get a "smart drink" make sure it has 5-HTP for the night and its suppose to help with some sleep.  Best place is a check vitamin or suppliment store.
Well there was a post in r/halo and the top coment mentioned r/halocustoms thats how i found you guys
This is incorrect. It's fluid that is under the carpet that has seeped upwards through the carpet.   These are not animal foot prints. 
I just spit out milk laughing. Thanks for making me laugh harder then I have in a long time.
Proof that 50 is just a number and not an age.
yes thats why i said, they might have a chance. both teams are kinda unpredictable. 
I've come to notice that the AI can complain when I spread my religion, but I can't complain back. It's very annoying. 
i used to smoke every day for the last 4 years. last year i started college and couldn't afford good grates, now i stopped smoking 7 weeks ago. i can concentrate better now and get out of bed better in the morning. so i would say yes weed holds you back.
We are *deeply* sorry. We're sorry. Sooorry
&amp;#3232; L &amp;#3232;  o
Superman's Dead by Our Lady Peace and Spiderman by The Ramones
Oh yeah, the one armed son
Oh God honey.  I'm 10 weeks with an IVF baby and I would have *killed* members of my family if they had put me in a position to have to talk about our infertility issues with people we hadn't chosen to do so with. I wouldn't get it from what you mentioned above, but after going through something like that, I can understand why you'd be a little hyperaware of something like that potentially happening.
Words of wisdom!
If loco/hs keep their early game feeding down, chauster/double will make the plays.
Is there really  a r/courtroomjustice, In my opinion the amount of sub reddits is getting a bit silly, it's too specific to post anything without someone saying it's in the wrong place
No big deal! I got it!
I really don't know. The only thing I know is that the "apotek" (=drugstore, until approx a year ago there was just one drugstore that had monopoly on selling medicine in sweden and that store was called Apoteket) only has been selling it as a laxative until recently when everyone suddenly started putting it in the hair
Because Jimmy is dead?
Ctrl +C works , so it guess t's ok
Fuck Nigger Shit Bitch Nut Suck Butt Fuck.  What Up.  Stick Up.
I'm British, and I went to Mexico (Mexico City, Puebla and Veracruz) six years ago for a family holiday.  For reference, it was just after the Felipe Calderon vs Andres Manuel Lopez Obrador presidential election in 2006, which saw "AMLO" narrowly defeated and his supporters shutting down various main roads in the capital and occupying the central Zocalo (square), and before Calderon's offensive against the drug traffickers which has led to the current violence in the country.  Whilst I was there, I did not experience any violence or crime: the political protests were peaceful, although a teachers' strike in Oaxaca, many miles away, was forcibly broken by the police.  I absolutely loved my experience of Mexico.  The food is excellent, the Aztec and other pre-Conquest archaeological sites (Teotihuacan, Tenochchitlan and El Tajin were the ones I visited), street life is colourful and vibrant, with plentiful public art exemplified by the murals painted by artists such as Diego Riviera, the weather is fantastic, and the natural scenery often breathtaking.  Everyone I met was extremely friendly, even though my Spanish is extremely limited and proficiency in English is not particularly common amongst the Mexican population.  I should also emphasise how diverse the country is, and the great  potential for pleasant surprises - from the building which was a perfect exemplar of Art Deco I found in Mexico City (which I think was a concert hall, but not certain), through local specialities such as mole poblana (turkey with an extremely complex and tasty sauce) and coconut milk with lime and chilli, to the variety of excellent local beers (due to German immigration and adoption of purity laws).  Some less attractive aspects of Mexico from my perspective include the fact that mains water is not safe to drink, the crazy driving standards that make any attempt to rent a car impossible to all but the bravest or most foolhardy, and the speedbumps installed in the motorways (highways)!  But overall, it's a wonderful country that I hope to visit again.  The current drug war situation - which occurred after my visit - is a real tragedy, and I hope a peaceful conclusion is reached soon.  However, I suspect that the scale of the problem is overstated by the world media, and that the vibrant culture I experienced still exists under the surface.  **TL;DR - Current political problems aside, Mexico is awesome!**
I went to your stream only because I never see karma anymore, but sadly you were playing amumu. :(
Ava Doll, my favourite.
Is the picture depicting the shirt in question? No. Do teachers typically dress for style or function? Function. Do teachers get riled up when the board suggests attire that is not practical? Yes. Does the average person realize that many schools have no air conditioning, and temperatures can become so hi, the waxy clips slide down the board? Are union members elected? Yes, they are, by the "nobody's" mentioned in this article.
Hey I live near Rome! I work near the city too!
I have a feeling it's going to end with Rick getting Maggie/Glenn back and retreating, and somewhere Darryl kills Merle. Michonne gets caught behind enemy lines, and that's where the governor goes all rapey. The next part of the season will start after a few days/weeks have passed and the governor has had his way with Michionne.
Sorry I think we've misunderstood each other a bit here.   These two had been found out to be gay in a very small-minded school. The school authorities decided that the best way to get them to change their mind (they believe it's a choice) is to put them in front of the school and expose them as what they are so that they would be ashamed and change their mind thanks to the ridicule of their bigoted schoolmates.  That's what I meant.
[Let him bang bro...](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rkN8V2Xogsw)
Those aren't magic words, you know?
Well that's some nightmare fuel. Just as I was about to go to sleep... This is actually one of my biggest fears.  Sadly enough, though, I can't personally help you as much since keeping pictures and backgrounds isn't a very good idea in my case. I do, however, have a couple of links to people posting their collections:  [Here you go](http://reddit.com/r/mylittlepony/comments/13xbdt/if_youre_interested_in_mlp_wallpapers_heres_a/)  [And here, though it's mixed now](http://www.reddit.com/r/mylittlepony/comments/13znnj/kinda_sad_want_to_talk_and_a_pony_pic_dump_inside/)  [Also here](http://reddit.com/r/MLPLounge/comments/13z09q/i_built_a_rollercoaster_of_feels_for_my_first/)
the token black kid?
No one tell him. Lets see how long he goes before he notices...
&gt; Btw nice try, replacing "foreigner" with "black". Wow, you can play that game with just about any topic.  Foreigners is an even wider group than just black people. It includes even more people than just black people.
Quick google search of psilocybin mushroom contraindications. You should be ok unless you are on any MAOIs.   Source: http://www.shroomery.org/11066/Mushroom-Notice  If you are interested in shrooms I highly recommend favoriting www.shroomery.org
I never thanked you for your suggestion.  I just recently commented on another thread and spoke about how karezza, among other things, helped me. You can check it out for yourself. 
I think it would be SUPER interesting if someone made a Wii U Pro controller set up as a GameCube  Could be like the WaveBird is wireless, but this built like a Wii U generic pro controller but the buttons are im the gamecube arrangement.  http://imgur.com/a/tYvst  I can imagine it now....
cool, I'll keep an eye out.
I would take my time on each planet rather than russian through it - the stories are really good.
Not getting ad loops but I am getting ridiculous lag on all resolutions
Same here, level 100.
I guess...any attention is good attention?
Chaldean and Assyrian are not languages. I'm an ethnic Assyrian, I'm an adherent to the Chaldean Catholic Church. Us Chaldeans also incorrectly refer to our language as "Chaldean." The technical name is Syriac, which is basically a translation of "Sourath." Yes there are different dialects depending on which village you are from.   Arabic is an entirely different language.
I heard lots of stories like this after my incident! Scared me shitless. It was during the day and there were lots of people around so I felt a sense of (probably false) security. It was Chicago, red line in fact. 
When my wife was acting sketchy, and texting a lot it was because she was cheating on me.  It went on for some time before I finally snapped, and looked at her phone.  It took me so long, because just like you; I thought I was overreacting.  I was never the jealous type, and I had always respected her privacy.  In hindsight I realize that it was silly of me to ignore my instincts. 
I lol'd so hard at that Ultima Online troll. "Thou Hath Been Had!"
Holy shit thank you! I had never heard of them so I googled them when i saw this. Absolutely incredible! Thank you!
Can you think of anything we could do to help the fighters? Or should we just give to refugee relief Orgs?
Noooooooo he'll get his creepy sub thing going on with Fefetasprite. Not cool. 
The two of us already discussed this over the face book so we have some ideas.   **SIDE CHARACTERS**  **Mutou is Mr. Fare**, not ironic just logical. He's a teacher a a lot of us had (I think) and many of us go to Sci-Fi club which he and Sasha run. And he is a science teacher.  **Kenji is me or [MrZestyFresh]**. I am a crazy conspiracy person but [MrZestyFresh] is random and weird. Also not ironic, that should just apply to the 6 main girls I think.  **Iwanako is python_regius**; [Krivoshein]'s actual girl friend. This makes sense because she is Hisao's original girlfriend and if the main character girls are all gonna be dudes, that leaves a female in this sub that we don't know what to do with.  **Nurse is Aabrar**? I don't know.  **Yuuko is Greg**. She stutters I suppose. Not really sure here either.   **GIRLS**  We can be ironic or logical, I have arguments for both.  **Hanako is [Calahagus]** because [Calahagus] hates her. No one is really that Hanako like. **[speedsk8]**?  **Shizune could be [spi007]** because [spi007] is loud as opposed to deaf and mute. **[jesus_de_lespace] is half-deaf** (check his comments, it's even brought up once in this sub) and wears glasses I guess.  **Lilly could also be [spi007]** because [spi007] is not sophisticated. **jLoop would make PERFECT sense** because he talks so eloquently and is so damn tall.  **Emi is jLoop**? jLoop is very very tall but Emi is short. However, I think he does or did Cross-Country so it's also fitting. **[jesus_de_lespace] could be ironic** because he is pretty tall and is not athletic in the slightest.  **Rin is [CJSBiliskner]**. It just must be. I'm not sure who actually makes sense for her.  **Misha could really be anyone**. If [spi007] is Shizune, then [Calahagus] should be Misha but he also must be Hanako.
Well prepare for this, then:  /r/conspiratard 
Michael Clayton instead of Steven Jackson or Vince Wilfork.  Which would have led to Demarcus Ware instead of Cadilac Williams.  Best, this past draft (trading back to get Barron, up to get Martin, up to get David) or (so it would seem this season) drafting Josh Freeman.
"Then you sir, are an idiot!" --CrispyHummingBird 2012©
I didn't even think to search for a thread about this  because I hadn't seen one and impulsively asked the question because I realized I didn't know everything like I thought I did.  I've been following college football closely for about 3 years now, and I know most of the BCS rules and tie-ins, I was just asking a simple question about something I realized I was unsure about either because I never learned or simply forgot how it works, the system isn't exactly simple.  As for the Oregon fan bit, I couldn't tell you, I know a lot of people on this sub-reddit don't like Oregon fans, I've had more then a few post and comments derailed by some kind of anti-Oregon circlejerk. I did some digging for other threads about this created by Oregon fans and could only find [this](http://www.reddit.com/r/CFB/comments/13tyui/is_kent_state_under_serious_consideration_for_a/). I did find a bunch of these threads created by other fans of other schools such as Ohio State and LSU. You even commented on those threads so I'm not sure why you decided to group them all as Oregon. I'm guessing you were just exaggerating so you could take a shot at us terrible Oregon fans.  Sorry for being such an inconvenience and trying to better understand the rules of a ridiculous post-season system.
I'm a cis-woman and I think I get how male control and patriarchy as a generalized structure works without having "inside knowledge." What does that even mean? Are you supposed to publish some secret document of the gameplan to world domination. I don't even understand what that person's asking of you.
Wasnt that great. But it was not like I stopped listening to them cause the album sucked I am just not listening to metal anymore.
Benedict Cumberbatch is making quite a name for himself as a villain
Twice as much as normal.
Johnny Walker or.... the sticky green?
basketball reasons. 
After you got off someone on the bus informed everyone else that wasn't even your stop.
Well, halacha is not the word of God and makes no claim to such.  It's the word of learned rabbis, but it's not the word of God; it's only interpretation of the word of God.  Some have come to the conclusion that some of this interpretation is not only wrong but actually harmful to people, so they have issued their contrary opinions on the subject.  The example here is egalitarianism.  We recognize it as a basic human right, but halacha not only makes a distinction between men and women but holds women to a specifically *lower* status, through no fault of their own but through vague notions about the honor of the congregation, because at the time of the opinion, women were considered shameful, or something like that.  In a previous comment I reference the blessing, *still in the siddurim*, where men bless God for not making them women, while the corresponding blessing for women bless God for making them according to his will.  Not "shelo asani ish" but "sheasani kirtzono".  Men are thankful for being men, and women are making the best of a bad situation and saying, "well, it was God's will; who am I to disagree?"  Equality is a moral imperative *that is not realized in traditional halacha*.  This is why we replace that sex-discriminating blessing with a simple "sheasani b'tzalmo", because we've realized that the Sages who came up with this stuff originally, even though they were learned men, we have, as a society, built on their scholarship and surpassed it.  We have the perspective of a history that they did not have.  We have the perspective of science that they did not have.  They were learned, but they were not God himself.  Since we now know moral principles that they did not -- that the sexes are equal, that gays are equally deserving of respect, etc. -- we can't expect everyone to abandon their moral principles and stick to an ancient custom that we've since shown to be immoral.  Following this particular part of halacha should absolutely not be forced on anyone, because when it is, we see the terrible effects; there have been documentaries and documentaries about the plight of women and gays forced into living a life of oppression, and how much they suffered *in real life*.  These are not abstract concerns.  If you want to remain committed to gender discrimination as a specifically halachic principle, go ahead, but don't force others to commit to the same kind of discrimination.
I always read that as Pornhub. 
 Sorry but being partnered up isn't "mooching". If someone is married or living together that's a partnership that THEY have worked out and no one outside of that relationship has any right or reason to criticize what goes on. Hence the jealousy, it's not your friends fault she has a supportive husband and you are single, homeless and have dead parents. She helped you out and maybe yeah felt superior but again-  "bad" life choices are expected in your teens, and 20's. Once you hit 27+ in age and make conscious irresponsible choices that land you at the mercy of OTHER people you have zero right to talk trash. 
Sauce?!
I didn't say that the Constitution guarantees a phone call. I said that your right to a phone call is backed by the Constitution. The Constitution grants us certain rights when dealing with the law; one of them being the Sixth Amendment, which grants us the right to council (a lawyer). Denying someone their phone call would be argued as denying someone their right to council. It goes on a state-by-state basis, they have their own regulations on how to handle anyone they're detaining. With most states, I believe 48 hours is the time-frame in which they have to grant you a phone-call. If you ask for an attorney, they generally have to get them right away, or they'll be in direct violation of the Constitution.  They can deny you a phone-call for a certain amount of time, a good rule of thumb is to just ask for an attorney, and then shut the hell up. But, if you really need your phone-call, you generally shouldn't say who you're trying to call; just ask for your phone-call. If they deny you the phone-call, any lawyer will argue that it is the same as denying you your Constitutional right to council.  Case dismissed.
probably he got off on it.
Val Kilmer at his best that was a good movie
Came here to upvote this. Surprised it was second instead of first. Ahhh Internets.
So have I, and while there's a change, my teeth are still yellow after a year. 
How was that a land grab? Israel withdrew from Gaza in 2005- it only went in this month as a response to the 200 rockets being lobbed at Israeli civilians through October, and even then how many times have they aborted airstrikes,  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=G6a112wRmBs&amp;feature=g-user-u http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UgHyT3FzTF8&amp;feature=g-user-u  Dropped leaflets,  http://news.yahoo.com/israel-warns-gazans-flee-homes-leaflets-154327074.html http://www.itv.com/news/update/2012-11-15/israel-drop-leaflets-warning-civilians-of-hamas-attacks/ http://media.carbonated.tv/88170_story__12.JPG  Made phone calls,  http://abcnews.go.com/International/israel-palestinian-conflict-phone-call-tells-gazans-missiles/story?id=17762083#.UKxnRuOe-9U  and pinpoint strikes,  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Kv7WzsL2mQc&amp;feature=g-user-u http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ESeT0xC_Dag&amp;feature=g-user-u http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Vrf9VsX6_4s&amp;feature=g-user-u http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3mKOsPYfpVg&amp;feature=g-user-u  All to avoid civilian deaths. 100+ deaths for ~1,500 airstrikes while fighting against a terrorist organization that publicly [admitted](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DwtRd3ZCNBs) to using its own people as human shields is a pretty solid statistic.
Sorry (on your behalf)
And if you're one of the many drag queens she invited who go, you also need to reevaluate your life.
You can come to, to, to, were going to the zoo!  http://www.zoo.org/lioncubs
My photographer did that with the editing process... When the 8x10 is printed out, it doesn't show up.
im so jealous!! i go to school in idaho and live in california, i wish my boyfriend was going to be stationed in utah then we could be only like 4 hours away from each other or even less as soon as i transfer to the school in provo (i go to BYU-I). 
I can't give you a hand nor do I want to, but have an upvote!
I'm not sure I'd use the word ideal here. Maybe ideal for making the most money, but not for getting the best multiplayer experience.
Oh you've never heard a knee crack? Imagine a loud KACHUNK sound as it pops inward, then a snap outward. Sometimes I can get three in a row.
Its actually on again right now. 
The first thing I thought was that they now have an orgy space.
Yep. Definitely [BraveStarr](http://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/WesternAnimation/Bravestarr?from=Main.Bravestarr)  Here's the intro: http://youtu.be/UaMo4k7iG7s?t=6s
I frequently carry around granola bars or bananas to snack on throughout the day, and if I see someone who looks like he or she could use it more than I could, I give it to them. Due to all of the anecdotes like the ones I'm reading here about how people don't give because "one time, this homeless guy totally had the gall to say no to my half-eaten pizza" or whatever, I was nervous the first time I offered an extra granola bar to a homeless woman around the corner from my office. She looked me in the eye and said, "Oh honey, bless you and thank you so much. I can't tell you what this means to me."  Since then, I try to offer whatever extra snack I have to people, if I can. I would say for every twenty people I talk to, one acts "ungrateful." The rest smile and say thank you. Maybe they'll eat it, maybe they won't, but it's what I can offer and I don't think it's my place to judge.   I'm not necessarily doubting the OP's interaction, or anyone else's, but I hate to see so many examples of how homeless people are all scammers  because "this one time" someone acted like an ungrateful jerk. 
I wish there were a way to say "Hey I love flowers and would love to get them whenever you feel like it, but don't feel like it's an obligation" casually.
If I drink, I drink shots. It's still disgusting but at least it's over with quickly.
BBW combines the best and worst of both BW's.  (Also, -1?  Did people think I was being serious or what?)
This is an important point. Teams rest their players all the time at the end of the season, throwing games and purposefully tanking to get a better pick.   If Stern wants teams to always start their best players, he should arrange the system so that regular season wins are better rewarded.  As it stands right now, a W during the regular season doesn't matter much (provided you are not fighting for one of the last playoffs spots) and some teams would rather take a loss in some situations.   Should Stern also punish teams that purposefully tank for 1 or 2 seasons to "rebuild through the draft"?
It's not a turn off to me.  Perhaps you just sound like an asshole whenever you try to talk about it- I feel like whenever people rail against "cliches" or whatever they usually tend to just sound like they think of themselves as above it all.  
Jesus you're so hot....the things I'd do with you :p
We're rarely on the internet, but when we are...
You suck.  He's sitting right next to me. I said this. He sucks. :D
Personally, I don't see any point to human existence other than relationships.
Jesus Christ! Thunder thighs! That girl could crush my entire upper torso in those machine-legs. 
http://i.imgur.com/RbNCy.gif
No need to apologize, I don't hold it against you if you weren't fully aware of it all. I've not finished SGU, so it would be confusing and/or spoilery for me to read right now. :)
http://www.lawyers.com/ Here you go bro. Pretty sure most aren't willing to do pro bono work.
I don't care what people think. They sell my favorite cologne there ( very sexy for men)
Mine said 2-3 weeks. If you get yours before I do I'm gonna be pissed
But see, you would be hurting people with your belief in raping babies.  What I mean to say, is if someone is praying to jesus right now, im not getting hurt, and it doesnt bother me.  If someone is praying to satan, or allah, or krishna, it isnt bothering me.  If they are keeping to themselves, and are happy about their beliefs, then I am happy for them.  I do respect everyone and their beliefs, as long as they dont hurt anyone, bother anyone, or force anyone into their way of life.  I also dont expect you to understand any of this.  You missed my point completely, you will miss this one as well. You are TOXIC.  Edit: Went through your history and read some of your other posts. You are a sad, sad person.  You say in one comment that violence is never the answer, then you post that you want to kill and rape babies.  Stick to your guns, dude. Also, I ignored you for ignorance. 
over 700 Palestinians were slaughtered in Syria last month.   no one cares, because Jews were not involved. 
Oh. Ouch :( I'm so sorry for you.
Not so unusual on this car. I did the research, so to speak, bypassed the models with trans. failure and ones before the newer wiring harness insulation materials. Also makes a difference among the first year left the factory fully synthetic fluids. Some trans. are maybe built a little more hearty than others. I think there's a difference in the trans built for the bigger engines. I think that's the type build trans I have, but with a medium power but high torque engine. Same chassis, different engine, the trans. goes at expected time (200k+?) but I think my model has a stronger transmission. Makes sense, eh? Like I said, I did the research and also paid some dues through ownership of earlier models. Through this way I could recognise the significance of certain things. I expect to get to 600k without any major problems. Some days I threaten to buy a spare trans but have not done it. If it ever becomes a problem, maybe I will grab a $1k beater car and then go looking for a trans. for the main car then. but it seems to be working real well at present. Car is an A#1 bitch on the road, road *machine*.
Sweet!  Let's make out! ;D
it's a kit for my EDC and my hiking backpack.  For everyday, I'm not so worried.   My main concern is when I'm biking in the woods or hiking up a mountain. Just need to make sure I have stuff to tend to the injury right away before trekking back.   I'm not talking about broken bones or anything that warrants me to call for emergency help.  I'm talking about anything i can take care of myself, such as a large abrasion, minor cuts and bruises. I just wasn't sure the difference between Tegaderm and Flexigrid, and why somebody would opt for that Xeroform instead.   I guess I can just buy Tegaderm from the replies.
And they ask why Spain's economy is in trouble...
If they are taking money under false pretenses, it's a scam.
if you buy a card with enough $$$ it will scan at the pump, but you can't buy "more" gas than the card is worth...
I see some creep taking pictures with his cell phone ;)
I don't know, I disagree for fun gameplay's sake. No one likes suffering a virtual seizure as soon as someone starts pelting you with AC/2 rounds.  I hate any sort of screen shake/blur/anything that obstructs the ability to play the game, personally, but I'll accept limiting the heavy shake to AC/20 impacts.  We had a big issue with this in Tribes:Ascend. The mildest hit from a machine gun would "crack" your screen and blur your vision. It was SUPER annoying since automatic weapons are very popular weapons.  It took months for the devs to finally acquiesce to the community's demands and remove screenshake from the game, and the game is much better for it. 
Much older brother convinced me his car stereo remote was actually from the fire department for emergencies and would let him change any streetlight to green. Then proceeded to show me several times. I was amazed. Then I tried it and he said that it required a code because, duh, it's from the fire dept (seemed reasonable at the time). Later on, this taught me how to read signals for when the green shows for my way. 
In a league with Chelsea and Man City, this isnt possible.
On top of what the other post said, you don't want to use cruise control because it also makes drivers a bit more careless and less into what they're doing. If you have to constantly throttle your speed, you daydream a bit less. In that kind of weather, you *must* pay attention.  The person who was presumably killed in this GIF had gently eased over into the middle area of the road, causing them to lose control. That's a very common symptom of "not paying attention."
I'd have "You've lost the game", just to troll people whether they knew me or not.
When I farmed for the bee shield, I farmed until I got so tired of nothing, I thought there was no hope, so I went to the Xbox dashboard and played a demo. When I got back onto borderlands I was already at the same place from where i last saved and quit so i decided one more time wont hurt. Sure enough I got it that time.
the band perry - If I die young
Yeah, I'm also having trouble getting any L2's. I have something on the order of 45 L1's though.
My best friend told me a story of when her son got in trouble and was on the street for awhile and he became friends with a begger. He owned a house and drove a mercedes. Maybe not new, but it was a mercedes and he was on the corner 4 or 5 days a week. Her son had been in his house. He probably isn't typical.   My father used to give some of those guys jobs.  After working, he'd have to drop them off where they would go join the big drinking party happening under the bridge... almost every night. I will buy cold water bottles from the guys selling it in the summer, though.
A picture of that bird dead the first time would be best. The hawk just left the poor thing there to die
I've never had too much of a problem with minimalist interpretations of stuff. But really? Edit: On my home computer screens now, previously all I could see was dark and random blue and I thought that was the entire design. Hahahaha. Yeah, you need to make sure that works on a variety of displays.
i want the code to play the game. saint row the 3rd looks AWESOME and so does darksiders. if i don't get the game i will buy the bundle a few days before if i can get enough money.
He said that?  o_O
If she's honestly telling you that the porn bothers her, then she's being honest. If she refuses to stop doing stuff that bugs you (refusing to flush after peeing or something) while expecting you to stop doing something that bothers her, THEN she is being hypocritical. Does her reading 50 shades bother you?
Probably not a thing to lose sleep over...
I don't see how it's whiggish to follow a trendline.  Every poll I've seen shows religion on a steady decline.
you did.
MY USER NAME. IT'S RELEVANT. I AM BEST CAPTION.
MY FUCKING FEELS
Here ya go, have another round on me: FUCKING DUMBASS
indubitably
I find it cute when americans try to tell me stories about how harsh their winter can be, but good job nonetheless.  Black ice is a bitch
let me be more specific, PC exclusive games, IE Dota 2, the game we are talking about, don't care about the console cycle when it comes to performance of the games, you brought up a game thats primarily a console game, so of course it will be optimized for consoles   if anything, they will quit supporting Windows XP since it will be cycling out, which will cause a considerable amount of people to have problems and need to upgrade, but it won't be because of new consoles which is what my main point is
Renaming your Bibarel "Bidoof" is pretty much the best part of this story. Either that or the part where you remembered you despise Sentret with a passion, though only after catching it. "Awww man that's right I hate Sentret, how did I forget that?!"
Glad to help.
Considering the illegal stranglehold Harper has on the country the ends justify the means.
I remeber in Warcraft 3, "why don't you lead an army instead of poking me."
[This week](http://i.imgur.com/JUHea.jpg) I picked up the 2 omnivore editions of Chew.  I've never really read any of Brubakers stuff (Daredevil run excluded) so picked up the Winter Soldier trade and Immortal Iron Fist. 
I'm surprised "Battleship" didn't make the cut. I thought it looked gorgeous; I have friends who were in the Navy who couldn't tell which ships were real and which were CG.  And the water looked great, too.  I realize it stunk up the box office, but ideally that shouldn't matter.
Starred.
It's not physically possible without turbo mode or something (the time to beat each level is too much) but I did play with her for a complete play through a while back which was basically me dying constantly and her letting me get every single Shroom hut and bonus available and maybe only dying twice.  She's a machine on the NES. 
Well close but not exactly what I meant. If a law isn't valid it can be enforced but challenged in courts and if the courts find it contrary to the constitution then they'll strike it down and it can no longer be enforced. 
Yes indeed. Expensive shipping, but this is a celebration, damn it. 
Your name is bagelstar.  I automatically win.
